Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments Reviewer Comment Rand Response Title is not very informative.
Should include something about Change Made the conditions under study.
Example: Efficacy and Safety of Ephedra for Weight Management and Athletic Performance Enhancement.
Since the stated overall objective is "to assess he efficacy of We think this is more appropriate for the herbal ephedra and synthetic ephedrine on weight loss and text, and the title reflects the uses for athletic performance ......" and since there is stated too few which we attempted to find evidence.
studies and data available to conduct an analysis of herbal ephedra on athletic performance, should not the title of the study be altered or the reported at least noted to reflect this limitation? I think you did an excellent job.
Having reviewed this subject No Response in more superficial fashion in the past, I can appreciate, more than most, what fine job you have done.
The overall purpose of the evaluation, including the questions, methods, findings and conclusions are clearly and succinctly written and easy to understand.
No Response
The search for relevant data appears to have been thorough No Response and encompassed a broad range of literature resources.
The study selection appears to be appropriate for an evidence-based review of this type.
No Response
Data collection and data synthesis appear to be reasonable.
No Response This is an excellent comprehensive review, and it will make an important contribution to the literature.
Strong points are a clear description of review criteria, rigorous assessment methods, and straightforward data presentation.
The questions formulated are relevant and appropriate, search strategies seem reasonable, and study selection is well justified.
The meta-analyses are useful.
The Evidence Report utilizes modern methods of metaanalysis of clinical trials.
However, it ignores a great deal of scientific evidence that can augment the interpretation of data from the clinical trials and has a major structural flaw and several weaknesses that are discussed below.
In my area of expertise (clinical studies of obesity), the findings were consistent with my understanding of the literature.
No Response
No Response.
A specific response to the "great deal of scientific evidence ignored" is presented where such evidence is specifically referred to.
No Response
The overall evaluation is clear, and the purpose of the report No Response is well stated.
Overall I found the report well-researched and written.
The questions were adequately formulated and easily understood.
No Response No Response
A3-1
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Reasons for inclusion or exclusion of studies were clear.
In evaluating the obesity weight loss clinical studies, the report acknowledges some of the problems [small numbers of subjects, short durations of treatment, etc.] and states that long-term assessments of effectiveness are lacking.
It would be useful to put these statements in the context of current knowledge in this area: that weight loss generally ceases after about 6 months irrespective of the treatment and any weight lost is generally regained.
Current recommendations for appropriate clinical trials in this area include a much longer duration of treatment [1 ­ 2 years] and an evaluation of what happens after the agent is withdrawn .
Both of these are very important in evaluating the efficacy and the risk to benefit ratio of a particular substance.
Although ephedrine plus caffeine combinations [pharmaceutical and dietary supplement sources] are being compared to certain prescription drugs, to date no ephedrine plus caffeine product has undergone the equivalent types of efficacy and safety studies that are required prior to marketing of a prescription drug in the US.
The purpose of the study and the means for arriving at its conclusions were clear and relatively easy to follow.
The Meta analysis approach was appropriate and the criteria well defined.
I believe some discussion should be given to the purported mechanisms of action (i.e. anoretic versus thermogenic) behind the " statistically significant "weight loss attributed to synthetic ephedrine/caffeine/ or ephedracontaining dietary supplements.
The impression given by the meta analysis results is that, while statistically significant, these types of products also provide clinically relevant weight reductions.
Given the results of the case report analyses, I don't believe the benefit of minimal weight loss (e.g. 1 to 3 pounds per month) outweighs the potential risk of serious adverse health effects exemplified by the case report analysis.
Despite the study's inability to assign causality to most, if not all, of the serious adverse events, the authors, in their conclusion, seem to downplay the "potential" risks associated with these products.
The appraisal of ephedra studies for weight loss could include a stronger statement about the unusually high attrition rates as compared to many drug studies.
Although this is mentioned in the Limitations section, it also might be included in the results section where the data is interpreted.
Can you expand on whether attrition rates differed between treatments a placebo groups? In my view, this is a major weakness of the recent efficacy studies involving ephedra.
Rand Response No Response This information was added to the limitations.
This communicates a value judgment about the balance of evidence that is beyond the scope of the EPC.
The concern about the report "downplaying" the potential risks is, as later peer review comments will indicate, shared by some other reviewers, but directly contradicted by others.
Attrition rates did not differ between treatment and placebo groups.
This has now been added to the results.
It is stated under Findings [p4] and elsewhere "that in Change Made aggregate the clinical trials only enrolled a sufficient number of patients to detect a serious adverse event rate of one per one thousand" or "three per thousand " in the case of
A3-2
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment botanical sources of ephedrine It would be useful to put these numbers in the context of the frequencies of adverse events [common, infrequent, rare, etc.]
Using commonly accepted definitions , all of the current clinical trials in aggregate, irrespective of source, lack the power to detect any rare adverse event [defined as greater than 1 per 1000 rate or frequency].
Throughout the report, reference is made to "synthetic ephedrine".
I suggest deleting "synthetic", since ephedrine is ephedrine.
Some is extracted from plants and some is synthesized.
The term "synthetic ephedrine" is ambiguous due to the meaning of the terms "natural" and "synthetic" with respect to natural products chemistry.
What could be meant are synthetically derived ephedrine alkaloids because these are natural products by virtue of their existence as naturally occurring compounds regardless of how they are produced.
Ephedrine is by definition always a natural product unless one is referring to the racemate that is produced during some synthetic production processes because the specific optical isomer that is identical to naturally occurring ephedrine is itself is itself often synthesized through chiral specific processes.
The fact of the matter is that what the draft means when referring to "synthetic ephedrine" could be either naturally or synthetically derived.
It may be preferable then, in the interest of clarity throughout the document, to use some consistent terminology, such as: "ephedra" as the name of the crude raw material (with parenthetical identification of the pinyin name: ma huang one time, but not as a substitute common name) which consist of the dried stem of the plant; "ephedra extract" when referring to raw materials or ingredients that are processed extracts of ephedra; "ephedrine " when referring specifically to those one alkaloids as found in the plant or wherever the term "synthetic ephedrine" now occurs in the draft.
I would place "synthetic" in front of all mention of ephedrine, or ephedrine alkaloids; for policy experts and others it is important to make the distinction between herbal and synthetic.
I would use "herbal" ephedra when possible.
I would also state more directly and more often why the synthetic ephedrine use is not reviewed as part of the AERs.
Also, contrary to the phytochemical section of the report, ephedra is know to contain (-)-norephedrine but not (+)norephedrine.
Phenylpropanolamine consists of (-/+)norephedrine, while ephedra does not contain (+)norephedrine.
The parenthetical identification of norephedrine as phenylpropanolamine should therefore be removed.
Change made As these contradictory comments indicate, there is no agreement among experts about standardized terminology.
In this report, for simplicity's sake, we use the term "ephedra" to mean the herb or herb abstract, and "ephedrine" to mean the chemical, regardless of source.
Rand Response
A3-3
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment A minor point in phytochemistry (page 13) is that only (-)norephedrine occurs naturally in ephedra, whereas the synthetic drug, phelypropanolamine is the racemic mixture of (+/-) -norephedrine.
So, it is more precise to state that ephedra contains norephedrine, as opposed to containing PPA.
After reading the RAND report, my first impression is the following: What are we evaluating ­ ephedrine or herb ephedra? The latter is not a single-chemical entity and cannot be assumed to be ephedrine.
Even assuming the herb ephedra in the literature is defined to contain specific dosage levels of `ephedrine,' what efforts were made to ascertain that this `ephedrine' is indeed ephedrine and not a mixture of ephedrine-type alkaloids, or, worse, different types of alkaloids that are also present in ephedra? Any study or report on a natural product (not just a singlechemical compound) must clearly define what the material under study or being reported is.
I don't see such a definition in this report.
Despite the limited availability of useful data, this report's conclusions regarding the efficacy of ephedrine (the single-chemical drug), in the presence and the absence of caffeine, in short-term weight loss and athletic performance, appears to be sound.
However, this cannot be said of the herb ephedra that contains ephedrine but is not equivalent to ephedrine.
Hence, the conclusion regarding ephedra's efficacy "Ephedrine, ephedrine + caffeine, and ephedra-containing dietary supplements + herbs containing caffeine all promote modest amounts of weight loss over the short term..." lacks supporting data, unless all the limited number of clinical studies employing "ephedra-containing dietary supplements" had clearly defined ephedra, including amounts of ephedrine and related alkaloids (not just ephedrine and inert herb carrier).
The ODS and AHRQ contracted with RAND (Dr. Paul Shekelle as Task Director) to conduct a thorough synthesis of the clinical efficacy and adverse effects of ephedra.
It was clear to me that the objective of this contract was met.
The review was complete and the researchers used the systematic review/meta-analysis tool to review the published controlled clinical studies on ephedra-containing dietary supplements.
There was a mention of 157 articles that were case reports of adverse events published in medical journal, however, they are not included in the case report and there are no mention of the finding in the Limitation section on page 110.
Would those case reports provide more information than what are available from FDA? Should a statement be made on why those published case reports not included in the analysis (e g potential duplication with FDA time and We agree that the lack of specificity is a problem.
We have modified the conclusions to be more specific to only these herbal combinations studied.
In the RCTs of herbal ephedra included in the efficacy analysis, the dose of ephedrine alkaloid was stated.
Rand Response
No Response
These case reports are now included in this revision.
A3-4
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment resources...etc.)? The report has been carried out and is free from bias.
It is objective.
I cannot comment on some areas of the report that are not my expertise.
The draft report is incomplete since it does not include a review of studies of two types: Toxicology in laboratory animals, and published case reports.
No response Rand Response
Published case reports are now included.
Toxicology and animal studies were not included, as this (and most all EPC reports) focus on clinical studies in humans.
We disagree that the report is slanted against the safety of ephedra products, and note the peer review comments we received with exactly the opposite opinion (i.e. that we were too conservative in our conclusions regarding possible adverse events from ephedra).
We have endeavored to keep the language of the report as factual as possible.
We note that other reviewers criticized the report for exactly the opposite reason ­ being "too soft" and "down playing" the risks of ephedra use.
We do not think we can revise the report to reconcile these two divergent opinions.
With regard to format, this report adheres to EPC format requirements.
With regards to phenylpropanolamine, we note other reviewers critiqued us for not making more of possible similarities.
In this case, we deleted the phenylpropanolamine sentence.
This draft emphasizes the subjective judgments of the authors over the objective findings of the clinical studies and therefore appears from the outset to have a slant against the safety of ephedra products.
Given the observations and comments above, one is left with the impression that this draft report has a tone or tenor that leans toward an apparently preconceived conclusion that ephedra supplements are not safe.
The tone is established in the abstract by reference to the FDA's AERs "related to herbal ephedra" and "available reports of herbal ephedra-related death, myocardial infarction (heart attack) and cerebral vascular accident (stroke)." the abstract goes on to describe "our causality algorithm" and later to use terms "probably causally related" and "possibly casually related".
Nowhere in the abstract is it suggested that these purported AERs were looked at objectively and found (to quote page 112) that "definite causality cannot be determined from case reports".
The statements in the abstract strike the reader as definite scientific conclusions rather than subjective observations that is not consistent with other objective data.
Nowhere in the abstract are the major limitations described, nor is there any mention that "scientific studies (not additional case reports) are necessary" (from page 113).
On page 5 it is stated that "Continued analysis of case studies cannot substitute for a properly designed study to assess causality", yet this is precisely what this draft report has done.
Additional statements and references point to a lack of objectivity and a bent toward sensationalism.
For example, page 5 a comparison is drawn with phenylpropanolamine and it's "reported association and cerebral hemorrhage" without nothing that the report at issues is highly controversial, or that the report found no association between ephedrine as an over-the-counter drug.
The mention of cerebral hemorrhage at the conclusion of the abstract is presumably also a result of some unfounded
A3-5
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment conclusion that phenylpropanolamine have been conclusively tied to cerebral hemorrhage when this is not the case.
In counterpoint to a description of the extent of present use and to the long history of use in China, references are made to media attention, lawsuits, a citizens' petition, and a ban by the National Football League, and a Canadian Warning.
These references are not helpful in a scientific review that should be evidence based, but instead give an impression of the slant toward a view that ephedra products are not safe.
Although the draft report contains much factual information about both the benefits and risks of ephedra, ephedrine, and combinations of one or the other with caffeine sources, certain critical components of a full analysis are missing.
Specifically, there is much proper emphasis on examining the data for evidence of causality, but little or no attention to the dose-response relationship within any possible causal case.
This is a critical limitation that prevents the safety component of the report from being fully useful.
The strength of this report is that it is not only comprehensive, but also objectively performed.
Another strength of this report is defining the areas that need further research.
The limitations are those imposed by the data.
It is clear what was done.
The major strength of study was the statistical approach utilized for assessment of efficacy and the incidence of minor adverse effects.
The major limitation was the coupling of conservative causality assessment criteria with limited medical records and toxicology data while interpreting the case reports.
While the case reports do not offer mechanism for assessing the incidence of serious adverse events, they shouldn't be dismissed completely owing to an overly conservative set of exclusion criteria.
Case control studies are definitely warranted, but it would be especially tragic if their outcome, when determined three of four years from now, confirm what is strongly suspected at the moment.
A dose response analysis has been added to the RCT analysis.
We indicate that we do not feel such an analysis is justified on the case report data.
Rand Response
No response
No response No response
We acknowledge our criteria are conservative.
We note the great deal of discussion among peer reviewers regarding whether a case report analysis was biased toward or against the safety of these products.
There are some nomenclature issues in the draft that should We have endeavored to keep the be corrected or clarified.
The term "herbal ephedra" nomenclature clear.
contains a redundancy, as by definition, all ephedra is herbal or herbally derived.
Also, and this goes beyond nomenclature to ingredient definition, the term ephedra is often used in the draft when in fact what is being discussed is an extract of ephedra with a specified percentage of ephedrine alkaloids.
This sort of misrepresentation of material identity leads to confusion between ephedra as a crude botanical, an extract of ephedra (the form most often used in dietary supplements) with a specified percentage of constituent ephedrine alkaloids (usually 8%) and the
A3-6
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment ephedrine alkaloids themselves.
Perhaps it could be made clearer that, overall, a very small number of people have been studied in controlled trials of any duration.
This is an issue as regards to safety, rather than efficacy where the studies, though small, are quite consistent.
This review reflects my perspective as a neurologist and stroke researcher.
It is a very valuable collection of data assembled to address clear, relevant clinical questions.
It was clear how the report was developed.
The major strength of this report is its collection of data systematically on one report for review and assessment.
The major limitation is the way in which the conclusion are stated and failure to distinguish for the lay reader the difference in strength of evidence of adverse reports vs. intervention studies.
We emphasize the limited power of the RCTs to assess safety.
Rand Response
No response
No response No response We have tried to make this distinction clearer in this revision.
This well-done report takes a conservative approach without No response, other than causality has extrapolating the interpretation beyond the available data .
It been removed from this revision.
clearly describes the methods used, limitations of the methodology, and results.
The text under Future Research describing identification of gaps in knowledge is particularly useful.
The presentation of the analysis of adverse events reports (AERs) might be made clearer by using different terminology or a narrative explanation of the causality designations.
We agree this outcome is important.
Quality of Life.
As I view the field of obesity, there are two However, we did not find it reported in the reasons people want to lose weight.
One is for the healthclinical trials we identified.
related benefits.
For most physicians, of whom I am one, this is often the major focus of our support for efforts to lose weight.
However, over the years, I have come to realize that the major reason people want to lose weight is because obesity is a "stigmatized" condition.
The fact that 75% or so of the people volunteering for treatment are women, and that obesity carries such a negative social view stimulates people, particularly women, to use over-the-counter medications.
Yet there is no mention that I can find of quality of life in this report.
Body Composition.
One of the interesting responses to treatment with ephedrine and caffeine in the reports of Astrup and his colleagues is the increase in lean body mass, or loss of less lean body mass.
The implications of this for use of these medications and in the future research is not even mentioned that I can find.
This distinction is not one that was included as an outcome of interest by our TEP.
We agree it is a potential area for future study.
Performance.
There is quite a literature on caffeine and We were not requested to assess the performance that certainly plays into the ephedra/caffeine literature on caffeine and performance.
use by athletes.
Yet none of this literature is dealt with here.
A3-7
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Drop Outs.
The issue of drop-outs is considered with the 
From a therapeutic effect, the "completers" in a trial are much more informative to me than using the data on those who drop-out in a last observation carried forward analysis.
We are certain that drop-outs are likely to regain weight - We aren't curing obesity and weight gain during the adult life is the "expected".
Moreover, if we do not use the LOCF approach, the impact depends strongly on when people drop out.
If they drop-out at month 5 of a 6 month trial it has essentially no effect.
If they drop out in the first month it has a major effect.
On page 3 there is mention that the studies have "particularly high attrition rates."
What is considered a high attrition rate? How do these studies compare to other studies on obesity? There is no explanation as to whether there is a particular challenge in all obesity studies or research in general, or whether this attrition rate appears to be unique to the ephedra studies.
Long-Term Trials.
In the Future Research area you call for "longer" term trials.
For all reported drugs the maximal weight loss is achieved by 6 months.
Continuing treatment usually maintains an effect, but because weight losses of 10% (20 lbs for someone weighing 200 lbs) does not often get them to a satisfactory weight, people drop-out because of perceived "failure" of the medication.
I thus have limited enthusiasm for long term studies with agents that don't produce weight losses of more than 10%.
On p. 4 you indicate that there are "no long term" studies.
As noted above, I think the 6 month studies that reach a plateau tell us about all we can expect from these trials.
Do you disagree? The report should be reorganized to focus on the conclusions about the need for further research.
The section on safety should address expected effects at intended doses and comment on adverse effects of higher doses.
The transient nature of the events observed in the clinical studies should be discussed.
The FDA AER database unfortunately is not of sufficient quality to comment on either of these issues related to safety.
Rand Response We agree that knowing when dropouts occurred might make it possible to better understand the results of weight loss trials.
However, when dropouts leave a study is not routinely reported and hence we did not have access to these data.
The attrition rate issue is explained in more detail on page 27, where 20% is identified as a threshold.
A high attrition rate is not unique to studies of ephedra, but regardless of study question a high attrition rate increases the concern regarding bias.
We clarified this to indicate both longer duration of treatment and maintenance of weight loss.
We do not know if the events observed in the clinical studies were all transient and would not characterize them as so.
A dose analysis is now included in this revision.
There should be another draft report issued to the TEP to This is not EPC practice, and there is no ensure that these issues are addressed to the satisfaction of requirement that the TEP be "satisfied" the TEP before a report is finalized.
before the report is finalized.
We intentionally recruit TEP members holding differing views in order to be made aware of all viewpoints.
Trying to get all such people to be "satisfied" with the final report is an impossibility as demonstrated by the wildly diverging comments we received from TEP members regarding the causality analysis.
A3-8
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response Para 1 I would use the word treatment duration, intervention Change Made length, or other terms designating the duration for which the participants were on ephedra/ephedrine instead of using "follow up".
I would not use follow-up as it denotes a passive time post-intervention for which participants were followed to measure outcomes.
e.g. 19 were excluded from pooled analysis because their intervention periods were less than 8 weeks.
The term "follow-up" can have a number of meanings in the context of obesity/weight loss trials.
In addition to referring to the duration of treatment with a test agent during which a research subject is evaluated, it can also refer to patient evaluation after treatment has been discontinued.
From my reading of this report, you are using "follow-up" to only refer to the time during which treatment is administered.
It might be useful to clarify this in the text as 8 weeks of treatment, etc so as to avoid any confusion in meaning.
I was slightly troubled by the exclusion of studies with less than eight weeks' follow-up.
While I agree that studies with less than eight weeks' follow-up are undesirable, if a large number of such studies exist, it does seem unfortunate to exclude them.
I would rather have seen them included and have separate analyses for a very short-term weight loss and slightly longer term weight loss.
I think that the exclusion of such studies, if there are many, opens up the report to allegations from companies who have done such short term studies that their important data were not included and that the report is biased.
I am not stating that I believe the report is biased, but only by any exclusion of such studies if there are many, opens up the report to this allegation.
Moreover, while as I said previously, I do not favor studies less than eight weeks' duration, I still think that while such studies exist there is something we can learn from them.
Page 2, para 4: It would be useful to give the reason that the Technical Expert Panel (TEP) gave for suggesting that follow-up of less than 8 weeks is insufficient to assess weight loss.
It is because the original charge was to assess long-term weight loss and the TEP thought 8 weeks could not be considered long-term? Follow-up of 8 weeks.
This term used on p. 2 and then many other places is confusing.
As a clinical investigator, follow-up usually means the time after treatment is complete.
You appear to be using it only for the treatment period.
It would confuse me less if you said "duration of treatment".
This review excluded 19-controlled trials that assessed ephedra or ephedrine for weight loss because there was follow up of less than 8 weeks in each of these This Change Made
The exclusion of studies less than 8 weeks duration was made by the TEP and not something we can change at this stage.
The key question specified "a sustained period of time" for efficacy and this was judged by the TEP to be at least 8 weeks.
Yes, and furthermore even short term weight loss would not be useful below 8 weeks.
Explanation made in the Methods.
Change Made
These studies were included in the safety assessment.
A3-9
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment exclusion is rational from the perspective of evaluating the evidence for efficacy.
Information obtained from these trials about short term adverse effects, or the lack thereof, would be valuable however in the overall evaluation of safety.
We strongly encourage the inclusion of all such data from these trials.
The statement, "In order to improve health outcomes, long term weight loss is necessary" is not accurate.
Usually in pharmacotheraphy for weight loss, long-term means one year or more.
I am not aware of studies that have used time in place of percent body weight loss as the important measure.
Because your point is that the studies were short (
It is not only that the ephedra interventions did not extend beyond 4 months but also that there was not sufficient follow-up to determine if individuals were able to maintain their loss.
See review by Yanovski et al., 2002 New Engl Journal Med.
Change Made Rand Response
Rewrite last sentence to say "In order to improve health Change Made outcomes and reduce the risk of morbidities associated with being overweight, sufficient weight loss (5 to 10% of body weight) and long term weight maintenance is necessary.
See comments on page 3 and 5 regarding use of term follow-up; treatment duration, ephedra intervention, etc.
No Response
Small weight losses (5 to 10%) of body weight reduce the Reference Added risk of morbidities associated with being overweight (Clinical guidelines on the identification, evaluation, and treatment of overweight and obesity in adults.
National Heart, Lung, and Blood Institute (NHLBI), Clinical guidelines for obesity, 1998.)
This first paragraph seems to blend intervention duration Change Made and follow-up post intervention.
Please rewrite to reflect data.
Longest intervention: 4 months (this is not "follow up").
You do not address whether individuals lost a certain percent of their pre-ephedra weight.
This measure is important when it comes to defining weight loss success.
Maybe the key points of DSHEA needs to be stated in the overview or somewhere else to emphasize herbal supplements versus supplements containing synthetic alkaloids.
Maybe place a sentence after the "In addition to the questions related to ephedra-...safety.
Because synthetic ephedrine alkaloids....
On page 3 the report mentions that an algorithm for assessing causality was developed by the authors.
Was the Percent of weight loss in the treatment group is now included in this revision.
We revised the text to try and improving clarity.
This algorithm was deleted from this revision
A3-10
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment algorithm unique to this study, or is there already significant scientific agreement to its accuracy and validity? If it is a new algorithm, who suggested its use? How was "reasonable certainty" determined? The Draft identifies question that guided this Report, both in relation to weight loss and energy enhancement, as "Does ephedra have additive effects with other agents?" Specific emphasis was placed on caffeine and caffeine-containing botanicals, but in Table 1 herbal "agents" were listed as "Herbs commonly combined with ephedra," presumably (though not stated) in products marketed for weight loss.
It is stated that "the majority of ephedrine (up to 97%) is excreted unchanged by the urine."
The 97% seems too high.
The recent paper by Christine Haller et al (Clin Pharmacol Therap 2002;71:421-32) indicates that about 60% of ephedrine is excreted unchanged in the urine.
This is important because the other 40% can be metabolized to other pharmacologically active alkaloids.
Change Made Rand Response
Change made
In places, particularly the introduction , the report focuses We present the results stratified by agent.
more on ephedrine than ephedra.
Since there were only 5 The efficacy results for ephedrine 
one is reported twice) and many more synthetic ephedrine, the ephedrine trials would seem to have greater weight than the ephedra trials.
Not clear how this influences the results.
There are several problems with Table 1.
No references We greatly shortened this Table to include were given to inform as to how the herbs included in this just the caffeine-containing herbs, as Table were identified as "commonly combined with ephedra" suggested by this reviewer.
and in fact it is our belief that several of the listed herbs are either uncommonly found in products containing ephedra and marketed for weight loss or are not found in the market.
For example, although the aloe resin is known to be a cathartic laxative, we are not aware that it exists as an ingredient in any ephedra product (or in any dietary supplement product), and if it does it is certainly not common.
Without attempting to be exhaustive, the same is true for at least the following: cocoas, coffee, scotch broom, jalap bark, and mayapple root.
In addition, several of the ingredients are at best questionable for the described categories, and follow-up should be undertaken to find references to support that yellow dock root is a cathartic laxatives.
These examples are again not exhaustive; references should be given to support each herb in its classification.
An additional oversight is that some listings do provide the part of the plant that is purportedly a commonly combined with ephedra, though very nearly 50% do not.
The federal law requires that botanical ingredients in dietary supplements identify the plant part and this Table should do the same.
A3-11
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Finally, the Table does not appear to provide any information that is useful toward answering any of the questions proposed by the funding agencies or those that guided the Report.
While the question of the additive effect of other agents was proposed and reportedly guided the report, there is no attempt in the Report to actually do this, except in the case of caffeine containing herbs.
In summary, it might be best to eliminate the Table to reduce it to consist of just the caffeine containing herbs.
If the table is maintained, some effort should be made to actually find each of the listed ingredients in one or more products in the market.
This is especially true for hers with significant toxicity potential, such as Scotch broom to mayapple as the final report should not communicate that these ingredients are "commonly" sold.
Preferably, such market information would be provided in the form of references.
The part of the plant that is used should be including for any plant listed in this Table.
References should be provided as to how classifications are made if the categories in the Table are maintained.
Notwithstanding the above comments the question whether all of these herbs should be included in the Table, there are several spelling errors in the botanical names: Coffea is correct, as in the 1st such listing but Caffea is not; Camellia is correct as in the 2nd such listing, but Camilla is not; the correct spelling of the species name for Mate is paraguariensis; the references species of mayapple is P. peltatum while Rheum palatum us correctly recorded as rhubarb, R tanguticum (misspelled in the Table) is considered to be a variety of R. palmatum (so R. palmatum var.tanguticum) and R. officinale is misspelled in the Table; the correct spelling of the botanical name for flax ends in "m" rather than "n" (so Linum usitatissium);Irish moss is in the genus Chondrus, not Chrondrus; contemporary authorities accept the name of the slippery elm to be Ulmus rubra rather than Ulmus fulva, these corrections may not be exhaustive.
Rand Response
A3-12
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response We have included some, but not all, of this The characterization of DSHEA in the Background section additional material when describing the of Chapter 1 is inaccurate, biased, unnecessary and badly DSHEA. written!! It should either be removed -It has nothing to do with the assignment-or expanded, to include other elements of the law.
For example:" The DSHEA was passed unanimously in 1994 based in part of Congressional displeasure with the federal governments 'adhoc, patchwork regulatory policy on dietary supplements.'
Under these regulations, herbal dietary supplements are not necessarily required to be tested for safety prior to marketing, although marketers are required to assure all of their products are free of significant or unreasonable risks.
Also, as with overthe-counter drugs, there is not a requirement to report health problems that resulted from their use.
The federal regulations that govern this class of goods are different from this that control either foods or drugs, but as with both of these classes, FDA and FTC maintain significant authority to regulate the manufacture, labeling and claims for dietary supplements and to remove unsafe products."
A3-13
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment The Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act of 1994 (DSHEA) The brief mention of Public Law 103-417 is inadequate.
In 1994, Congress passed the Dietary Supplement Health and Education Act (DSHEA) amending the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act.
In DSHEA, the term "dietary supplement" is defined as: 1.
A product other than tobacco intended to supplement the diet that bears or contains one or more of the following dietary ingredients: * a vitamin; * a mineral; * an herb or other botanical; * an amino acid; * a dietary substance for use by man to supplement the diet by increasing the total dietary intake; or * a concentrate, metabolite, constituent, extract, or combination of the above listed dietary ingredients.
2.
A product that is intended for ingestion is not represented as food or as a sole item of a meal or diet, and is labeled as a dietary supplement.
3.
It includes an article that is approved as a new drug, or licensed as a biologic, and was, prior to such approval, certification, or license, marketed as a dietary supplement or as a food unless the Secretary has issued a regulation, after notice and comment, finding that the article, when used as or in a dietary supplement under the conditions of use and dosages set forth in the labeling for such dietary supplement, is unlawful.
4.
It excludes articles that are approved as a new drug, certified as an antibiotic, or licensed as a biologic, or an article authorized for investigation as a new drug, antibiotic, or biological for which substantial clinical investigations have been instituted and for which the existence of such investigations has been made public, which was not before such approval, certification, licensing, or authorization marketed as a dietary supplement or as a food, unless the Secretary, in the Secretary's discretion, has issued a regulation, after notice and comment, finding that the article would be lawfully marketed as a dietary supplement.
5.
It deems a dietary supplement to be a food.
6.
It excludes a dietary supplement from the definition of the term "food additive."
Important safety measures were included in DSHEA.
A food could be deemed to be adulterated if it was a dietary supplement or contained a dietary ingredient that: 1.
presents a significant or unreasonable risk of injury; 2.
is a new dietary ingredient for which there is inadequate information to provide assurance that such ingredient does not present such risk; 3.
poses an imminent hazard to public health or safety; or 4.
contains an ingredient that renders it adulterated.
Important clarifications were included in the law regarding labels and labeling.
Section 5 of DSHEA provides that a publication shall not be defined as labeling when used in connection with the sale of dietary supplements when it: 1.
is not false or misleading; 2.
does not promote a particular manufacturer or brand of supplement; 3.
is displayed so as to present a balanced view of the available scientific information; 4.
is displayed physically separate from such supplements; and 5.
does not have appended to it any information by sticker or other method.
6.
places the A3-14 burden of proof on the United States in establishing that such matter is false or misleading.
Additionally DSHEA: 1.
Set forth conditions under which nutritional claims may be made with respect to such supplements.
2.
Deemed a dietary supplement misbranded unless its labeling meets specified guidelines.
3.
Deemed a dietary supplement which Rand Response
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment The draft sites in it's Chapter 1 the findings of a 1996 meeting of the FDA's Food Advisory Committee (FAC), stating that "over half of the members recommended removal of dietary supplements containing ephedra on the market" and gives as it's reference Dr. Lori Love's testimony in August 2000 at another meeting.
To assure that the findings of this meeting are most accurately reported it would be best to add a statement such as "a finding that was in direct contravention to the recommendation of the Special Working Group of experts that had been empanelled to offer guidance to the FAC.
"The transcript of the 1995 meeting of this Special Working Group can be seen at http://www.cfsan.fda.gov/~dms/dsephe1.html .
The more important factor with regard to this statement, however, is that it is false.
The transcript of this meeting is available on the FDA's website in two PDF files (see http://www.fda.gov/ohrms/dockets/ac/cfsan96.htm).
Regardless of how Dr. Love characterized the recommendations of the FAC members, the record shows that only 4 of the eleven voting members of the FAC stated that ephedra products should be removed; even when calculating the opinions of all the meeting's participants, well under half made statements to that effect.
The statement in the Draft could be corrected either by changing "over half of" to "a minority of" or by reversing the two sentences (At this time over half of the members recommended that the FDA develop rules on use that would help reduce risk over adverse events, a recommendation that trade groups had made two years earlier".
Finally, the use of the word "Thus", at the beginning of the next sentence in this section implies a direct relationship between the reported advice of the FAC and FDA's imposed rule.
This is a reinvention of the historical facts.
FDA stated in its proposal was based on information that included, but was not limited to the opinions of the FAC.
More detail should be added to this section if the report is to be an accurate record of facts.
If the only limitation accessible about the history of the controversy regarding the use of ephedra in dietary supplements was from the Background in the Draft's Chapter 1, one would conclude that federal health officials, consumer groups and National Football league had been actively attentive to this issue while industry stood by.
This is not the case.
The Background information should be expanded to include some or all of the facts: that AHPA adopted labeling guidelines in 1994 that were substantially familiar to those later proposed by FDA; AHPA adopted dosage limits (25mg/servind; 100mg/day of ephedra alkaloids) in 1995; AHPA and others specifically requested in public hearings in 1995 and 1996, and in a meeting with FDA in 1999 that the industry policies be adopted by rulemaking; AHPA and others submitted a Citizen petition in October 2000 (prior to the Public Citizen petition identified in A3-15 the background) to make the same request in a more formal manner.
Rand Response
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Many scientists would disagree with the statement [page 4, and elsewhere] that "definite causality cannot be determined for case reports when the adverse event is very serious" [or various iterations of this statement]
As a separate comment, it is unclear as to whether the data on the number of servings actually represents servings manufactured by a particular company or some other measure.
D. Finally, the report should not repeat the industry assertion that three billion servings of ephedra were consumed in 1999, unless this is based on hard facts.
It's a self-serving statement that has the effect of diminishing the safety concerns over ephedra by perhaps inflating the frequency of exposure.
Is the three billion estimate based on quantities sold? Surely not all dosages were consumed.
p.10 FDA concerns about the safety of ephedrine alkaloid containing products sold as supplements preceded the passage of DSHEA, which changed how FDA could deal with safety in the context of supplements.
Rand Response We note this comment, and also note that many scientists would agree with it.
At any rate, we have deleted from this revision the causality assessment.
We have revised this statement to make clear this is the industry's contention.
Change made to reflect this is an industry assumption.
We revised the text to reflect this.
Change made Two references in the background section should, in my opinion, be changed.
On page 11, you state that "weight loss has been associated with decreased morbidity and mortality" and cite ref. 26, the Williamson et al study.
Actually, the literature on this point is quite controversial, and despite the Williamson study, much of the literature shows an increase in mortality with weight loss.
All of these studies are observational, and subject to serious limitation.
This is why NIDDK is undertaking a very large study (Look AHEAD) to answer questions about morbidity/mortality with voluntary weight loss.
The DPP does suggest that intentional weight loss in persons at risk can delay or prevent the onset of type 2 diabetes in persons at high risk.
I suggest that you state instead that "intentional weight loss in obese persons leads to reductions in risk factors for disease" and cite the NIH guidelines: Clinical Guidelines on the Identification, Evaluation, and Treatment of Overweight and Obesity in Adults--The Evidence Report.
National Institutes of Health.
Obes Res 1998; 6 Suppl 2:51S-209S.
Also, on page 14, ref. 69--when discussing the role of ephedrine in humans, its role in stimulation of beta three adrenergic receptors in brown fat is noted.
There is very little brown fat in adult humans, and I'm unsure that this would play any role in ephedrine's thermogenic effect.
The reference cited is an old one (1982).
Someone should be sure that this citation represents current thinking on the role We deleted this comment.
A3-16
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment (if any) of brown fat in the thermogenic effects of ephedra compounds.
The definition of overweight is 
The attempted intentional weight loss data is only for 1996.
Change made The 1998 data you reference is a paper that only includes a subset, only 5 states.
The latest national data on attempts for weight control is the 2000 data that is in Reference 10.
Therefore, you may want to delete reference to the 1996 data and instead use the 2000 or just edit the sentences to say "The same survey when administered in 2000 showed that one third (38.5%) of subjects were actively trying to lose weight and another third (35.9%) were trying to maintain their weight.ref 10 Furthermore, among those who were overweight 45.0% of subjects were actively trying to lose weight and 34.9% were trying to maintain their weight.
Among those who were obese, 65.7% of subjects were actively trying to lose weight and 20.8% were trying to maintain their weight" ref 10.
I then go on to reference 29 data.
The would suggest using the estimates from Reference 29 to determine a denominator for use.
I would suggest also using the Michigan data from this paper to support claims that consumers are not aware of the ingredients in their herbal supplements.
Ref 29 ­"In a population-based study of 14,679 U.S. adults in 5-states using the 1998 BRFSS data, 7% reported using nonprescription weight loss products; 2% reported using PPA and 1% reported using ephedra products from 1996 to 1998.
More women used ephedra products than men; 1.6% of women and 0.4% of men reported using weight loss products containing ephedra.
Extrapolated nationally, this study estimated that during 1996-1998, 2.5 million Americans used weight loss products containing ephedra.
"This study also has data to suggest that many individuals are not aware they are taking weight loss products that contain ephedra.
Of the 183 respondents in Michigan who responded no to the questions about using ephedra and reported to have taken "other" nonprescription weight loss products, 33% reported using name-brand products that claim to contain both ephedra products and chromium picolinate.
" I would rewrite the sentence regarding Harnack et al. (2001) This change was made consistent with to be the following (inclusion of small n and previous of previous reviewers comments.
ephedra specific for weight loss).
It is hard to follow what the 12% of the total is when you don't give the original total usage (61.2%); and, it is really 5.3% that used ephedra for weight loss This is larger than Ref 29 but Ref 29 has
A3-17
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment 14679 individuals whereas the Harnack study has only 376.
Among 230 (61.2%) of 376 adults in the St. Paul/MSP area who reported using an herbal products during the past 12 months, 44 (19.1%) used ephedra.
Of these 44, 20 (45%) used ephedra for weight loss.
Therefore, 5.3% of adults (20 of 376) reported using ephedra for weight loss.
--Taking these estimates, you find that 20 (5.3%) of 376 individuals used ephedra for weight loss during the past 12 months (1998/1999).
Some of the herbs mentioned in the last sentence are not listed in Table 1.
Many of the latest formulations also contain bitter orange.
I would add these to the Table.
On page 9, the following key information is provided: Ephedra has been used for over 5,000 years.
Three billion doses have been sold.
Even after the FDA's campaign to advertise the AERs and to have more AERs reported, there has been a 65% increase in volume of sales over the previous five years.
Even after the FDA's campaign, there are only 1,500 AERs out of 3 billion servings.
That calculates to about 1 adverse event in every 2 million servings.
By anyone's standards that is very safe.
On page 10, the statement, "Still, the controversy over ephedra continues," and a reference to litigation have no place in a scientific analysis.
It is doubtful that such information was garnered from a review of the published scientific literature.
Inclusion of this type of information takes away from the science.
Information from the scientific literature on ephedrine (the purified alkaloid) regarding it mechanism of action.
There is a fair amount of literature (1910 to 1930) about ephedrine.
For example, Chen KK, Schmidt CF. Ephedrine and Related Substances, Medicine volume 9, number 1, 1930.
Page 10 paragraph 1: Obesity, The definition of obesity had changed since 1991.
A result of this change was that in the mid-1990's many more people were considered obese than previously.
So, although the incidence of obesity had been increasing since 1991, the change in definition makes it seem more dramatic than it actually was.
As a result, this statement may need to be qualified.
Page 12, paragraph 2: It is appropriate to extrapolate figures from 511 subjects attending a gymnasium to the general public? Suggest qualifying this statement.
The RAND Corporation has drafted a document entitled "Ephedra: Clinical Efficacy and Side Effects" in order to assess the efficacy of herbal and synthetic ephedrine on weight loss and athletic performance and to assess the safety of herbal ephedrine products through review of adverse events reported in clinical trials and in reports on This Table has been greatly shortened and this part has been deleted.
This is a judgment and not a statement of evidence, which is what the Evidence Report presents.
Rand Response
We disagree that these sentences take away from the science, we think they are necessary to put the science in context.
This section of the report was not intended to be exhaustive, but to provide context for the reader.
Many relevant references may not be included.
This is probably true, but by most standards the incidence is increasing.
At any rate we did qualify the statement.
We indicated this is the authors' extrapolation.
No specific response to these general comments.
Specific responses to specific comments below.
A3-18
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment file with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA).
This report will focus on the safety assessment in the RAND report.
Prior to commenting on this assessment, however, it is important to note that the RAND report includes a formal meta-analysis that concludes that products containing herbal ephedra and caffeine produce significant weight loss over a 4 to 6 month period.
This weight loss is similar to that documented from synthetic ephedrine plus caffeine.
Given the epidemic of obesity in the United States and the associated morbidity and mortality from obesity, it must be emphasized that weight loss may play a large role in reducing morbidity and mortality.
In fact, several studies have shown that weight loss associated with herbal ephedra and synthetic ephedrine are associated with significant reductions in parameters associated with cardiovascular disease among the obese (e.g., reductions in triglycerides, 1, ApoB, 1 and LDLcholesterol;2 and increases in HDL-cholesterol2).The evidence for weight loss is quite robust because it is derived from controlled randomized trials.
The best data for safety would also be derived from randomized trials.
RAND reports on adverse events within randomized trials, noting that there were "no serious adverse events (e.g., death, myocardial infarction, stroke) reported in these clinical trials."
Because of the limited numbers of subjects studied in these trials, these studies could only detect a serious adverse event rate of one in a thousand.
That is the studies can exclude a rate of serious adverse events of greater than one in a thousand.
This should not be inferred to mean that the rate is one in a thousand nor that ephedra even causes adverse events.
In the absence of additional controlled studies, RAND then turned to adverse event reports (AERs) filed with the FDA up to September 30, 2001.
The limitations of AERs in proving causality, especially when viewed in isolation of the totality of evidence, are well known and have been discussed extensively in the literature and basic textbooks of pharmacoepidemiology.
Causality cannot be proven by AERs because there is no comparison control group.
Authors of other reviews of AERs in the ephedra database have noted that a collection of AERs "does not prove causation, nor does it provide quantitative information with regard to risk."3 There are several reasons for this which will be discussed briefly.
To what end was this inquiry directed? Most exogenously ingested chemicals that are thought to enhance athletic performance are banned from competitive sports.
To what end will the results of such an inquiry be applied? This report was commissioned by AHRQ 
Rand Response
Given the most contradictory recommendations of the We believe that every person on the TEP CANTOX report regarding the safety of the ephedra has a bias.
Our goal in selecting the TEP supplements why was a member of CANTOX included as a was to try and get a balanced set of
A3-19
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment part of the Technical Expert Panel? Some bias may have been imparted from a member of an organization with such close ties with the ephedra industry.
Of note, no neurologists (and particularly no stroke experts) were included on the Technical Expert Panel.
Rand Response biases.
We judged it important to include in the TEP a member with close ties to the industry who was also scientifically credible.
While true, a neurologist was included in the group assessing the case reports and a neurologist was included in the peer reviewers.
Our TEP defined this for us as indicated in Table 3.
The group was charged with assembling and evaluating the evidence that ephedra and its congeners favorably affected "energy enhancement", affected weight loss and improved athletic performance.
"Energy enhancement" is a vague term and it is not clear how it can be measured or tested.
A basic problem in the method adopted for the pooling of studies rests with the false assumption that these herbal preparations have been standardized and are similar enough in constituents, potency and purity that they can be assumed to have sufficient homogeneity to justify pooling of results.
In fact, there is much evidence that this is not the case.
Yet much of the report rests on the results of the pooling of many under-powered studies of herbs or ephedra where potency and constituents are vaguely described or even unknown.
The herbs are mixtures of many chemicals with various actions so it is doubtful merging or pooling such studies represents a scientifically legitimate exercise.
In sum, this report addresses two questions that are not relevant to the public health: "energy enhancement" and "improved athletic performance".
The public health question it does address, obesity or weight loss, is not answered due to the heterogeneity of the products examined and pooled and the lack of long-term follow-up studies.
The case reports of adverse events possibly due to ephedra or ephedrine are not well described and the algorithm adopted is too rigid and is being applied to a data collection system that is unable to obtain the data required for causality in the algorithm.
There is no ephedra or and risks to research is the product
We disagree with this opinion, and point out the chi-square test of heterogeneity did not reject the null hypothesis of no difference in the effects reported in the four ephedra studies.
The key questions were given to us by Federal Agencies and defined by our TEP. Causality was removed from this revision.
reason to engage in further research concerning This is an opinion and not a comment ephedrine.
Enough is known about its benefits about evidence to which we can respond.
remove the drug from the market.
More merely a stalling device to delay the removal of from the market.
No response as there is no specific critique of methods or analysis.
That ephedra has efficacy for weight loss seems to be true, though people can quibble over how much.
The key question, as I see it, is: Is there credible evidence that ephedra poses a significant or unreasonable risk of harm, even when taken at recommended dosages? This report so far is inadequate for addressing this question.
Page 23, paragraph 3: This paragraph is not clearly written.
Change Made
A3-20
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment What about: To be accepted for pooled analysis, studies were required to be controlled clinical trials according to the following definitions [insert definitions].
Page 26, first sentence: Not sure about the implications for BMI of assuming an average height 5'8".
Where did this number come from? Does it affect the outcome significantly is this number is off? Because study ref 87 is in adolescents, I question whether transformation of the data using a height of 5' 8" is a good decision.
I would suggest contacting the study authors and request the actual individual height data.
Page 27, Paragraph 1: Less than 20% attrition is a commonly accepted threshold below which concerns about bias increase due to loss of follow up.
Should this read greater than 20% would be concern for bias.
Page 28: Meta-Analysis.
Will the two Danish trials be included in the final analysis? Update literature searches past December 2001, if appropriate.
We chose this number arbitrarily.
The results do not change across a range of potential heights.
A sensitivity analysis using 5'4" made little difference in the results.
Therefore we do not feel it necessary to contact the original authors.
The reviewer is correct, change made.
Rand Response
Yes.
Done
The questions guiding the evidence report were relevant, These questions are the same but refer to, well formulated and easy to understand.
The only problem I respectively weight loss, athletic saw were questions 3, 7 and 12 were the same (Does performance, and safety.
ephedra have additive effects with other agents?) Most of the questions were related to the herbal ephedra, but much of the data reviewed was based on synthetic ephedrine.
"Of the 517 articles collected, 56 were controlled clinical These numbers have been reconciled.
trials of either synthetic ephedrine or herbal ephedra..."If the number of articles are added together (56+146+84+19+47+4+3+157), there are only 516 articles.
According to page 53 of the Evidence Report, there are 48 controlled trials identified.
It is unclear if the two Danish trials are included or not.
Even if it is, there are still discrepancies with the number.
In reading the objectives, one assume that synthetic ephedrine was also part of the study objectives.
However, this is not the original intent (see page 19 on Original Potential Key Questions).
Should the changed in objectives be explained in the evidence report (rather than just a statement of agreement by TEP on page 20)? It will be more corrected to state that, "Forty-eight were controlled trials assessing ephedra/ephedrine for weight loss."
Most likely the only detailed analysis of all the trials of ephedrine in the literature.
The detailed explanation of the method with tables and graphs are helpful to the reader.
It is explained in the text why this change was made, and we also changed the title to reflect this.
Change Made
No Response
A3-21
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response Should the same list of questions applicable to ephedrine as We listed the question as received from this is listed in the Objectives, or does ephedrine serve only AHRQ, and then describe how these were as information (if that is the case, the objectives need to be modified for the task order.
reworded)? Page 20, paragraph 2, last sentence:... categories of patients: children, adolescents, young athletes, and adults.
These are not generally patients, but rather potential consumers of ephedra or ephedrine products.
Change Made.
Change Made.
Page 22: Additional sources of evidence.
Readers may think it unusual (as did several of our reviewers) that RAND would place an announcement seeking unpublished studies in Phytomedicine and Herbalgram.
They would wonder why such announcements were not put into more mainstream medical journals such as JAMA and Lancet.
It might be useful to mention that the intent in choosing Phytomedicine and Herbalgram was to reach individuals who might know of small studies being done on ephedra or ephedrine the TEP may not have been familiar with.
It is quite evident that a concerted effort was put forth by the authors to search all relevant databases and literature sources for clinical studies assessing the efficacy of the ephedrine/caffeine and ephedra containing dietary supplements.
I was somewhat surprised that advertisements were placed only in Phytomedicine and HerbalGram.
Phytomedicine is a relatively obscure journal while HerbalGram is targeted more toward the layperson.
Were other journals considered? On page 26, the authors state that when a standard deviation was missing they imputed an average standard deviation from all other available data.
They further state that they weighted all other standard deviations equally (IF I understood them correctly).
It was unclear to me why they would weight all the standard deviations equally rather than weighting them by same size.
We weighted each study equally in the imputation procedure, i.e. we did not weight each study by its sample size (we assume the reviewer meant "sample size" not "same size").
Neither approach (weighting equally or weighting by sample size) is entirely consistent with our assumed random effects model.
The approach we did take is simply applied, and we have found in practice that the results are fairly insensitive to weight choice.
On page 42, the authors indicate that in their reporting form, The form has been correct to read BMI greater than 27 was defined as obesity.
This seems an "overweight/obese". odd choice given that both the NIH and the World Health Organization have now reached a consensus that a BMI greater than or equal to 30 should represent obesity and this information was available prior to the initiation of the current project.
On page 55 the authors describe some power analyses.
It was not crystal clear to me what null hypothesis was under consideration in the power analyses the described I think This text was revised to try and increase clarity.
A3-22
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment greater clarity in this section could be achieved.
In the weight loss category, of the 24 trials listed in Evidence Table 2, 4 were excluded, 2 because of study design, the other 2 because of "insufficient statistics" and lack of "weight loss outcome" (addressed weight gain).
However, 4, available only as abstracts, were rated using the Jadad system, scoring 0,1,2, and 2.
Of the 20 trials included in this weight loss panel, only 5 used herbal ephedra, the other 15 employing the pure alkaloid ephedrine.
Interestingly the highest scores (5) on the Jadad scale were to the two Boozer studies, which combined herbal caffeine ( kola and guarana, respectively).
No Response Rand Response
Regarding the efficacy aspect of ephedra/ ephedrine use, These were included in the safety analysis.
the rejection of 19 of the identified 48 controlled trials on the The text has been changed to reflect this.
basis of a lack of 2 month follow-up, appears reasonable, but assessment of the 19 terms of safety indication may add to the pool of data.
We did include all available trials in the The literature search seems to be appropriate, with the safety analysis and have clarified the text relevant publications being identified.
The study selection to reflect this.
for efficacy analysis seems justified, whereas the selection of studies for safety is not appropriate.
This reviewer finds it justified including only the controlled trials with a placebo arm for efficacy analysis.
But for safety evaluation is obvious that all trials should be included.
The safety information collected during a clinical trial has much better value and validity than the cases received through the FDA.
I suggest therefore that the analysis of safety in terms of adverse effect dropouts and side effects should be reexamined with inclusion of all the available trials.
Could you estimate the average amount of weight loss per month in each of the ephedrine groups and in the placebo weight loss groups.
For the lay press and political readers this may mean more to them than the difference in weight loss between the active intervention and the placebo.
This revision now contains the percent weight loss in the treated group.
It is clear there are data gaps with respect to ephedra use No Response and effects which are apparent in this study.
However, I did not identify any evidence of bias in the data collection process.
It appears that the researchers made every effort to reduce No Response bias in the data collection process.
The data collection process was systematic and thorough.
Problems were identified and explained in the Limitations section of the report.
The researchers did acknowledge that missing information did exist and also described this in the Limitations section.
It seems as if the researchers did the best they could have done with the literature captured in the meta-analysis.
Is there a minimal amount of missing information regarding We conducted sensitivity analysis on
A3-23
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment outcomes and other variables considered key to the interpretation of results? The fact that the studies that were found has 6 month or less treatment duration.
That is too short a period of time to fully analyze safety or efficacy.
I believe you did a fine job in synthesizing the data.
There was one inconsistency that I think might have been a typographical error.
In table 15 you state that the pooled monthly weight loss in pounds is 2.7.
In the text on page 55 and 56, you state that the same monthly weight loss is 2.1 pounds.
You my want to check this apparent conflict.
Reasonable decisions were made concerning whether and how to combine data.
Precisions of results were indicated.
Limitations and inconsistencies were also stated.
All study designs were considered in the synthesis and reasonable decisions were made as to combining the data.
Precision was reported and limitations described.
Limitations and inconsistencies were stated along with limitations of the review process.
The meta-regression was used in an attempt to compare treatment across trials.
At one or more points the authors used the term "cathartic".
I am not certain I know what they mean by that .
Do you mean laxative? Rand Response attrition rate greater or less than 20%, and the results are reported in the text.
We acknowledge in the limitations that the short duration of the identified studies limits the conclusions that can be drawn.
This discrepancy has been corrected.
No Response
No Response
Yes.
I believe that there are at least three major reviews related In this revision we do not review previous to this topic to varying degrees that merit mention.
I believe reviews, therefore we did not act on this the authors have mentioned at least two of these three.
The comment.
three of these are: the CANTOX Report; Frank Greenway's recent review, and a review by Allison and colleagues which appeared in critical reviews in Food Science and Nutrition in 2001.
Each of these reports addressed the use of ephedrine products for weight loss in part or in whole.
I do not think any of them need to be discussed at great length, but it should be mentioned an the authors of the current report should briefly mention whether their conclusions largely agree or do not agree with those prior reports.
The authors are probably also aware that, subsequent to their producing this draft document, there was a Senate hearings on the use of dietary supplements for weight loss, at which a number of experts provided testimony.
The written testimony from several of these experts are available on the Senate's website.
The authors may wish to briefly mention this in their report and cite any key relevant information that appeared in that testimony that was not available to them this report was written.
I think that as it intimated above, any studies excluded must be carefully accounted for.
The exclusion of studies opens up the reports to potential allegations of bias.
Therefore, I would advocate that the authors include a very detailed table of all excluded studies giving the reason for their We considered doing so, but felt the report had so many tables already that this table was of marginal extra benefit.
A3-24
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment exclusion and a full reference to the study.
If the authors have already done that and I missed it (the tables were quite extensive and I confess that I did not go through them with a fine toothed comb), I apologize.
I was confused on one point.
I thought that the authors only included studies that were randomized, double-blind, placebo-controlled trials.
If I understand the scoring of the Jadad system correctly, a study that is randomized would get at least one point, and a study that was placebocontrolled ( and therefore presumably double-blind) would get a second point.
Therefore, all studies should receive a score of at least 2 on the Jadad scale.
However, I thought that I saw some point that some of the studies received scores less than 2.
Can this be clarified? I was somewhat disappointed by the authors discussion and use of effect sizes.
First, the discussion is slightly simplistic at points.
For example, it seems to imply that the particular effect size metric they use is "the" effect size rather than "a" specific metric of effect size.
Moreover, it is generally wellrecognized that when the outcome measure in a field of study is something that had intrinsic or accepted meaning it is perfectly reasonable to use this outcome measure rather than the particular effect size metric the authors used, which scales things relative to within group standard deviations.
This is the case with body weight, where most investigators and people in general understand pounds and kilograms.
There is no reason to standardize by the standard deviation, which makes the data less interpretable.
In fact, several meta analyses have appeared in the literature on obesity and simply use pounds or kilograms.
I agree that several meta analyses have as appeared in the obesity field that have used the standardized effect size that the authors use, but I personally see it as unnecessary.
It is not only unnecessary but it can create situations in which there is less clarity.
For example, two studies can achieve the same absolute weight loss and yet one study because it is much more tightly controlled may have a smaller standard deviation.
This latter study would achieve a larger effect size and yet I do not think that most people would see it as more efficacious if the same number of pound or kilograms were lost.
The authors themselves seem not to accept this metric of effect size because they later back transform if two pounds as a way to help the reader interpret the results.
Finally, although a minor point, the authors should use metric units of weight (kilograms) rather than pounds.
The metric system is the accepted system in current scientific practice and the authors report will be perceived as less professional otherwise.
Being not a statistician I do not understand certain parts in Studies were included if they were controlled clinical trials.
Such studies can score zero on the Jadad scale.
Rand Response
The effect sizes were transformed back to changes in weight loss in pounds.
We also assessed whether conducting the analysis entirely in pounds changed the results.
It did not.
We also continue to report the results in pounds because US audiences are more familiar with this unit of measurement.
The methods text has been revised to
A3-25
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment the Methodology.
For example, effect size is not defined in the section "Weight Loss Effect Size" (page 25), the paragraph in the Safety Assessment, Controlled Trial Adverse Events, Meta-Analysis section on exact conditional inference methods versus asymptotic methods (page 29) was not very clear.
On p. 2 you describe the "effect size" determination.
Although it becomes clear later that you are comparing them with placebo, this one sounds like it is only for single treatments.
I am confused.
Rand Response improve clarity.
An effect size is calculated for any comparison of two groups.
In general I think that this a reasonable objective, and have A dose analysis is included with this little doubt that this will make a useful contribution to the revision.
We also tried to make sure our field.
That being said, I think there are a number of points statements were accurate.
that, if carefully addressed, could improve the document.
I detailed specific comments below.
In the main summary (I.e. pages V and VI) the authors made no mention of dose.
I think that this is a marked oversight.
It could inappropriately be taken as an indication that they statements they make apply to all doses.
Clearly this is not the case as the statements they make can only apply at best to the doses for which they observed the data.
I believe the authors should consider substantially softening several of their statements.
The first one to catch my eye was the statement on page VI that "the effects on weight loss of synthetic ephedrine plus caffeine and Ephedracontaining dietary supplements with herbs containing caffeine are equivalent..."
As I am sure the authors are well aware, lack of evidence for an effect is not the same as evidence for lack of an effect.
We can never marshal sufficient evidence to unequivocally prove the null hypothesis.
We can only fail to reject a null hypothesis.
If the authors had access to multiple, very well controlled studies comparing herbal and non-herbal ephedrine, this conclusion might be warranted.
However, based on the data they have observed, a far softer statement such as "We observed no statistically significant difference between the effects of herbal and nonherbal sources of ephedrine and caffeine" would be much more appropriate.
The authors may perceive me to be a stickler on this point.
I am suggesting that the authors try to particularly cautious throughout this report in framing their conclusions because of the highly contentious nature of the topic they are studying.
Even if these authors never enter a courtroom, it is highly probable that they will "speak" in one or more courtrooms through this document.
That is, lawyers and expert witnesses representing multiple diverse interests are likely to cite this document in court cases.
For this reason, it is crucial that the authors say exactly what they mean and state exactly what can be supported by data and be vary catious about making statements that could be
A3-26
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment misinterpreted or overextended On page 11of the report, the authors state some numbers regarding how many billions of dollars obesity costs.
Although I do not think these numbers are especially relevant to the report and could easily be eliminated without any loss, if the authors are going to cite them they should cite the most accurate information available.
My colleagues and I published a report in the American Journal of Public Health in 1999 in which we showed that prior estimates of the costs of obesity were almost certainly inflated by a fact of approximately 25%.
If the authors are going to cite cost figures they should probably cite our paper and lower costs showed therein.
We stated that the reported value is only one estimate.
The point, we think, is that obesity has an enormous cost in terms of health.
We also included this reference stating that another estimate was 25% less.
Rand Response
On Page 14 under Pharmacokinetics, I thought the authors We made this modification.
may wish to consider softening their statements about the lack of difference between herbal and non-herbal sources of ephedrine in terms of Pharmacokinetics.
It seemed to me that the studies they reviewed did not fully support what appeared to be their conclusions, namely that there were no important differences in pharmacokinetics between herbal and non-herbal ephedrine.
The authors state that two physicians working independently extracted data in duplicate and resolved disagreements by consensus.
It would be interesting to know how often such disagreements occurred.
That is, can the authors present any indication of the reliability of their coding scheme.
With respect to the search strategy, the authors seem to have been quite thorough.
However, there are two sources they did not mention using that, in my experience can be extremely useful for this type of work.
The first is the United States Patent and Trade Office which now has all patents on line.
The online data base is searchable.
One can often obtain quite a bit of additional information on this topic by finding companies' patents.
Second, although, in my experience a less important source, Dissertation Abstracts International, Which also had on line searchable databases can occasionally help uncover additional studies.
I can certainly understand the last thing the authors probably wish to hear at this point is a suggestion they go back and search for more literature.
Whether they ultimately choose to do so is obviously up to them.
However, at minimum they might want to do a type of "sensitivity search" to see if it seems likely that they would have missed a great deal of information by not searching these databases.
Regarding herbal ephedra for weight loss: There are apparently no studies addressing whether weight loss is maintained after ephedra use is discontinued.
This is a very important gap in our knowledge and should be explicitly We did not assess in this project (or any similar project) a measure of disagreements, such as Kappa, and therefore cannot report this.
We did not go back and search these databases.
No reviewers identified any missed trials, so while we can never be sure, we judge it unlikely that there are significantly large and well done RCTs that were not included in our analyses.
An addition was made to the limitation section.
A3-27
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment pointed out.
With all other weight loss medications, weight is regained after their use is discontinued, suggesting that lifelong use (whether continuous or intermittent) is likely needed to maintain weight loss.
If this is also true for ephedra, adverse events must be considered from the perspective of chronic ephedra use rather than episodic use.
This has important implications for clinical use, public health, and study design to detect adverse effects.
The HHS requested this analysis to evaluate the safety and The issue of studying select populations efficacy of ephedra/caffeine products when used for weight was added to the limitations.
loss or exercise enhancement used in the absence of medical supervision.
However, the reports that have been analyzed have all been performed on subjects that were screened for pre-existing medical conditions and were followed during the trials with medical supervision.
For example, in the most recent study by Boozer et al., the investigators excluded one of every ten subjects they screened for medical history or for conditions that made ephedra/caffeine, in their estimation, to be unsafe.
The only trials that could have adequately addressed the question posed by HHS would be any that enrolled an unscreened population and followed them with little, if any, medical supervision.
Such studies are not feasible or ethical because of the general knowledge that ephedrinecontaining products are dangerous.
An Institutional Review Board would not accept this study design.
The report should note that the clinical trials reviewed (at least the ones with which I am familiar) had strict criteria for medical exclusion and require careful monitoring for safety during the study.
This is the result of the general understanding of the medical community that these products are dangerous and therefore requires medical supervision during their use These are topic areas that may be worthy The other major flaw in the analysis is that it failed to of review but were outside our scope of adequately consider the pharmacology and clinical work. pharmacology of sympathomimetic amines.
The consistency of the evidence across a range of chemically related substances must be considered.
The relative safety and efficacy of other drugs that have similar pharmacologic actions is absolutely relevant.
Every drug with sympathomimetic actions that have been studied adequately has been associated with serious cardiovascular and neurological adverse events.
Likewise, the actions of drugs that antagonize the effects of ephedrine should be considered.
For example, adrenergic antagonists reduce the incidence of strokes and heart attacks.
The questions are clearly formulated, but some of the answers are difficult to find.
For example, the answer to question 7 on page 19 was buried in paragraphs on page 14.
I might suggest adding to the summary chapter, brief answers to the questions you posed that are based on your We reported the questions as we received them.
We tried to reword our conclusions to better match the questions.
Rand Response
A3-28
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment analysis.
Although the summary does address many of the questions, it would be nice to see the answers lined up with the questions.
For example, the answer to questions 7 may be something short like this: " Ephedrine releases norephedrine from nerve terminals stimulating alpha and beta adrenergic receptors.
Caffeine magnifies this effect by slowing the breakdown of cyclic-AMP inside the cell through the inhibition of phosphodiesterase."
This is not an attempt to suggest text, but just to give an idea of how it might be possible to address the questions you posed in a two or three sentence answer.
The questions are understandable but not well formulated.
The questions should be specific for the way the ephedrine/caffeine products are being used.
To ask whether they are safe without specifying how they are used ignores the potential selective bias.
The selection of 24 hours as a window for exposure to ephedra is conservative.
It is quite possible that ephedra could cause coronary or cerebral vasospasm that could persist much longer.
This certainly has been described for other sympathomimetic drugs such as cocaine.
The 24 hour criterion was set by the TEP and not something we can change.
Rand Response
In evaluating the adverse events, why was documented use This criterion was set by the TEP of ephedra with 24 hours made a criterion? This timing interval is far shorter than that used in the PPA epidemiology study [use ~72 hours].
Furthermore, this criterion tends to exclude those adverse events that are not necessarily time or dose dependent or whose effects are not ascertained until some critical threshold is exceeded [e.g., immunological reactions; hemorrhagic stroke with symptoms of an antecedent headache not considered "typical"].
Requiring documentation of ephedra exposure within 24 hours of the acute event may be biased against the most serious cases when a patient cannot provide a history of recent use because of death, coma, aphasia, or other sever impairment.
In the absence of toxological results a reliance proxy history by a household or family member should be adequate.
Most likely the only detail analysis of all the trials of ephedrine in the literature.
The detail explanation of the method with tables and graphs are helpful to the reader.
We did count as satisfying this criterion a report of the subject consuming ephedra or ephedrine within 24 hours.
No response
Is the FDA data on the products that contain ephedra based It could be based on the label or on direct on label claims that it is ephedra or there are lab analysis analysis.
confirmation? This should be stated as many of the products tested claim to contain "ephedra only" contain ephedrine and pseudoephedrine and no other ephedra alkaloids.
This is likely due to a non-naturally occurring source.
A3-29
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment "In September 2001, the FDA's Office of Nutritional Products, Labeling, and Dietary Supplements produced an excel spreadsheet...for the dates specified" What is the inclusive date of the requested report? The literature on herbal supplements/medicines is replete with reports based on undefined or poorly defined research materials.
This occurs at least one of three levels: (1) research, (2) reporting research findings in journals, and (3) abstracting/indexing journal articles for database entry.
Unless serious efforts are made immediately to set criteria for researchers at all three levels to follow, further research in the herbal supplements/medicines field will only continue to generate data that will continue to lead to ambiguous conclusions and hence, controversy.
Ephedra and ephedrine are no exception.
Ephedra herb (defined as the green herbaceous stem) sometimes contains up to 30% root material, which has different types of chemical constituents than those of ephedra herb.
The root has completely different traditional uses than the stem as well (e.g., antiperspirant vs. diaphoretic).
And the root contains macrocyclic spermine alkaloids (ephedradines) that are hypotensive, as opposed to the hypertensive effect of ephedrine in ephedra herb.
Also, ephedra herb from different sources (Ephedra sinica, E. intermedia, E. equisetina, etc.) contains widely different levels of ephedrine among the ephedrine alkaloids (30%90%) present in the herb.4 We can't assume the results from ephedra herb containing `ephedrine' are equivalent to those based on the single-chemical drug ephedrine unless both the following two conditions are met: (1) the efficacy and safety evaluation is only based on ephedrine and (2) the concentration of ephedrine in ephedra has been specifically defined by definitive chemical analyses.
Otherwise this `ephedrine' could only be 30% ephedrine, with the rest (70%) being made up of other phenethylamines (e.g., pseudoephedrine, norephedrine, etc.) as well as ephedradines (from root material present as adulterant in the raw material used for extraction); the latter have different pharmacological activities and toxicities than ephedrine.
Line 3 should read this: "Less than 20 percent attrition is a commonly accepted threshold above which concerns about bias increase due to loss to follow up.
Rand Response From inception to September 2001.
No response
We added to the limitations the lack of standardized products for ephedra.
Change made.
The cases of seizures (n=70) and fainting/loss of The seizure cases are now included in this consciousness (n=63) may represent serious cardiovascular report.
events such as syncope due to cardiac arythmia.
You may want to add to table 1, Bitter orange extract (Citrus This portion of this Table was deleted in aurantium) and Garcinia Combogia.
this revision.
A3-30
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment In contrast to the Rand draft report, the relation of the potential of consumption of ephedra to the dosage involved was the central point of the ephedra risk assessment contracted by the Council for Responsible Nutrition and performed by Cantox Health Sciences International, Mississauga, Ontario (http://www.crnusa.org/CRNCantoxreportindex.html).
The Cantox report reflects a true risk assessment that includes (1) evaluation of the evidence for a hazardous effect, (2) dose response relationship evaluation, (3) uncertainty assessment, and (4) identification of a dose that does not carry significant risk under specified conditions of use.
The Rand report includes one important topic not addressed by Cantox--the benefits of ephedra.
Rand Response No response
Given the animal toxicology data that includes wellA dose analysis is now included in this documented toxicity at high doses, as well as many revision and this revision no longer assigns anecdotal cases from the drug and dietary supplement causality. literature that point toward ephedrine or ephedrine alkaloid toxicity, examination of the ephedra adverse event report (AER) dataset for possibly, likely, or even "definite" causality seems to be a moot point unless the dosage that produced that causal case is identified and put into context with the recommended dosages.
There are abundant examples among the essential nutrients of the absolute necessity of applying this principle.
For a comparative example, a conclusion that vitamin A can cause liver damage may be true but is misleading, and actually harmful, as a generality.
Clearly, scientists should recognize the critical importance of dose in any evaluation of causality, but not all policymakers or legislators, much less the general public, can be expected to do so.
Thus, it is critically important to recognize and evaluate the dosage involved in any possibly or likely causal cases of adverse effects by ephedra.
The Rand evaluation of risk stops a major and critical step short of the Cantox risk assessment in that little attention was paid to the dosage involved in adverse effects that might be casually related to ephedra ingestion.
The absence of any significant dose-response consideration in the evaluation and conclusions is very clear in the Structured Abstract sections Main Results and Conclusions (page vi).
This omission inexplicably occurs even though in the Methodology section (page 19), the Safety Assessment list of considerations asks the appropriate dosage question.
This virtual absence of dose-response assessment in the entire report is reflected in the section on Attribution of Adverse Events (pages 20-21).
In that section, the "dose question" is asked mainly in relation to the temporal relationship, not a dose-response quantitative relationship.
Likewise, in the section on Causality Analysis of Case Reports, the three key points of the causality algorithm do not include any evaluation of the dose that produced the
A3-31
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment adverse effect.
A complete evaluation requires an answer to the following question: If the answer is affirmative on all three key points, what dose was involved? Paracelsus got it right some 500 years ago--"the dose makes the poison."
Without consideration of dose, we can justifiably conclude that anything, indeed everything, is a poison.
The necessity of adequate information to answer the doseresponse question is exemplified by AER 13408, released by the Food and Drug Administration (FDA).
In contrast to the labeled dosage of up to six capsules per day, the wife of the 26 year-old male in this case acknowledged to the FDA investigator that he "took a handful at a time, several times a day."
This case is mentioned only to illustrate actual dosage may bear no resemblance whatever to labeled or expected dosage.
Regardless of oral reports of specific dosage, the actual dosage should be assumed to be completely unknown, without confirming pharmacokinetic information or other objective information.
Pharmacokinetics.
There are two published studies of the pharmacokinetics of ephedra, both from the same laboratory (Gurley, references 74, 75).
Unfortunately, the results are not consistent, but rather conflicting.
It is strongly recommended that future research include a carefully designed comparison of the pharmacokinetics of ephedrine and two ephedra formulations, one comprised of powdered whole herb and the other powdered extract of the whole herb, in human volunteers.
This should resolve the issue of a potential difference between purified ephedrine and the herbal products.
The report notes the similarity between ephedrine and phenylpropanolamine (PPA) but fails to consider the relevance of the data with PPA to ephedrine.
The suggestion that a trial similar to the one with PPA should be performed ignores the fact that most would consider the study to be unethical.
The only ethical way to do the study would be to exclude patients at risk for cardiovascular events but that would make it impossible to accurately define the safety in an unscreened population of patients.
Again, it would not be ethical to conduct a case control trial to quantify the magnitude of harm from a drug known to have the ability to cause strokes and heart attacks.
The only reasonable recommendation from this analysis is that the drug (ephedrine/caffeine) has modest short-term efficacy and probable safety when used under medical supervision.
If it is to remain available to the public it should only be used under medical supervision, i.e. dispensed only by prescription.
The review of the safety of a drug with potentially rare adverse events must include a complete consideration of the polymorphisms of adrenergic receptors that have been We agree this is an important line of research, but think this falls somewhat lower in priority than our first three listed recommendations.
Rand Response
The case control study suggested is an observational study design that does not compel subjects to take anything, and in most situations starts after exposure has already occurred.
We do not think it any more unethical to conduct this study than the PPA study.
We judged this beyond the scope of our report.
A3-32
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment identified that could explain variable response and idiosyncratic reactions (Am.
J. Human Genetics 2002: 70; 935-42).
The polymorphisms that result in failure to develop tolerance are especially important to be considered.
The section on metabolism should include some mention of the metabolic polymorphisms that result in deficient metabolism and accumulation of excessive drug levels.
The evidence report questions were easily understandable.
No response Rand Response
There was a paper published several years ago in the We could not find this paper so we could American Statistician, Unfortunately, I do not recall the not include this.
authors' names.
However they presented a particular method as a way of analyzing MedWatch Report data from the FDA.
In brief, the method entailed creating a contingency table between types of events on the one hand, and drugs or substances ingested on the other hand.
By looking for cells with larger than expected frequencies, one can potentially identify drugs with particular hazards.
The authors might consider adapting this method to their data, or at least mentioning it.
On page 54, the authors state that "a sensitivity analysis on We do note this prominently in the text but also note this effect was only observed for only those studies scoring 3 or greater on the Jadad scale studies of ephedrine without caffeine. yielded a pooled estimate of effect size substantially lower than the main analysis...this difference...did not quite reach the conventional levels of statistical significance (p=.053)."
In my opinion this is an extremely important finding.
The literature on supplements for weight loss is riddled with a large number of trials of a very dubious quality.
It is often difficult to know how to interpret such trials.
It is easy to point out the flaws in these trials, but the obvious question is do these flaws matter? No study is perfect, and defenders of the claims companies make based upon these flawed trials are quick to point this out.
The finding from the current authors suggest that such flared trials may be giving misleading answers.
I believe that the authors should much more carefully describe this result and its implications and portray it much more prominently in the report.
On page 58 the authors state that there are data from the pharmaceutical literature that support the contention that patients taking pharmaceuticals outside of clinical trials may have a greater risk of certain adverse events than do patients selected to participate in clinical trials.
The authors should supply one or more references supporting this statement.
On page 59 the authors state "Thus bias may exist, as the events we included were different in terms of type vs. those we had to exclude."
It is unclear to me exactly what they meant by this.
I suggest that they describe exactly what bias they are referring to.
Reference added.
We revised the text to try and clarify this point.
A3-33
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Health Canada discourages its citizens from using ephedra for weight loss.
They say they have at least 60 reports of adverse events.
It's not enough to say that you haven't received them.
You must get them and include them in your analysis.
The US military discourages its people from using ephedra.
A Col Mike Health, identified as an Army pharmacy consultant, states on the armymedicine.army.mil website: "There were 25 documented active-duty deaths of soldiers, sailors, airmen or Marines who had died and were coincidentally taking ephedra-containing products."
You must get these and include them in your analysis.
The American Association of Poison Control Centers collects information on human poison exposure cases, including cases attributed to dietary supplements.
In 2000, 2.2 million cases of poisoning were reported to 63 centers.
The Los Angeles Times reported on September 2, 2002, that the nation's Poison Control Centers collected 9,000 cases of ephedra poisoning since 1993.
Where are these? You must include them in your analysis.
E'Ola, a manufacturer of ephedra products, admitted in a lawsuit deposition in 1999 that it had received 3,500 complaints about ephedra from its customers that it had not forwarded to FDA.
Where are these? They should be included in your analysis.
There are at least 25,585 reports of adverse events associated with ephedra that you have not included This report must deal better with the issue of dosages.
Some people dismiss reports of ephedra-induced reactions as the consequences of over-dosing.
Which events among the likely or possibly associated with ephedra use involved subjects taking only the recommended dosages? Why were the criteria for high blood pressure set at systolic BP 
This would be consistent with the definitions of serious adverse event as defined by MedWatch and in CIOMS [ required intervention to prevent serious outcome....]
Ascertainment of the rate and risk of clinically significant hypertension would be particularly critical in any safety assessment of ephedrine alkaloid containing products for use the general population where a "learned intermediary" is not required.
p. 50 Figure 4 brief data collection form for case report: what criteria were used to establish the categories under psychiatric [e.g., severe depression, psychosis] Rand Response The EPC did request adverse event reports from most of 
We did not receive any.
The EPC does not have the power to compel organizations to provide any data.
Furthermore, the adverse events that were assessed leave us unable to conclude anything about causation.
Therefore, our expectation is that the inclusion of additional case reports is unlikely to increase our certainty about a causal relationship between ephedra use 
It is not possible to tell which patients were taking the recommended doses.
The criteria were set at a level sufficiently high that treatment would be warranted that day.
The implicit review of experienced clinicians.
A3-34
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment On page 59 it is stated that "we did not examine the remaining 251 adverse events because the descriptors in the master excel spreadsheet were of conditions less severe....."
The descriptors mentioned in the listing were of the `adverse event as reported' [usually by a consumer] rather a diagnosis or precise description of signs and symptoms.
Consequently, this description may be an unreliable or inadequate characterization of the adverse event, its severity or seriousness.
It may be better to state that the remaining 251 AERs appeared to fall outside the focus of serious adverse events [deaths, cardiovascular, CNS, etc.].
Were other measures of variation included, e.g. confidence intervals or limits? Could these be used instead of having to impute standard deviations? The questions were clearly formed.
The search methods were appropriate and resources were clearly documented.
Rand Response We changed the text to reflect this.
If possible we back calculated the standard deviation from other information include din the report.
Otherwise, we reported the standard deviation.
No response No response
Inclusion of Non-Scientific Adverse Event Reports Invalidate Animal and laboratory data were outside the Integrity of the Study our scope.
There is a potentially fatal weakness in the report in that there is no inclusion of a discussion on the peer-reviewed animal and laboratory research but extensive discussion of the non-peer-reviewed, non-scientific FDA Adverse Event Reports (AERs).
The inclusion and heavy dependence on data that the General Accounting Office has already concluded was flawed is likely to nullify the scientific integrity of the report.
The GAO report stated: We do not see how this critique of FDA is While FDA's conclusions regarding the desirability of the proposed action may be valid, we believe these conclusions applicable to our report.
are open to question because of limitations and uncertainties associated with the agency's scientific and economic analyses.
The GAO found that the AERs were poorly documented; that the FDA did not perform a causal analysis to determine if, in fact, the adverse events reported in the 13 AERs it used to set dosing levels were caused by supplements containing ephedrine alkaloids; and that the FDA indicated in its proposed rule that 10 to 73 percent of reported adverse events might not be related to consumption of dietary supplements containing ephedrine alkaloids.
Have AERs ever been included in an AHRQ or RAND Evidence-based Center review before? An important hallmark of the evidence-based review or meta-analysis is the establishment of strict criteria prior to the review and an adherence to the established criteria once the review begins.
Any deviation from criteria once the study begins may result in a flawed analysis and a loss of credibility Case reports have certainly been included as a course of evidence in other AHRQ evidence reports, for example our own report on a "Best Case Series for CAM Treatments of Cancer".
A3-35
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment The inclusion of AERs as part of this review appears to be a serious deviation both from what AHRQ requested and from the standard criteria used in conducting a meta-analysis.
On page 4 of the draft, the authors conclude, "the majority of FDA case reports are insufficiently documented to make an informed judgment about the relationship between the use of ephedra-containing supplements and the adverse event in question."
Devoting approximately 50 pages to AER reports in the report seems incongruent with the space devoted to descriptions of the peer-reviewed scientific data.
There is also no explanation in the AER evaluation of products that were found to be illegally marketed as dietary supplements, which in fact were misbranded.
Some of the early and most serious adverse events were from products that were adulterated with high doses of synthetic ephedra.
In fact, as our analysis shows, there were more deaths as a percentage of total AERs reported in the more recent data compared to the older data.
Rand Response
Several of the preliminary questions provided to RAND have A dosage analysis is included in this not been addressed in the report.
We expected a review of revision.
the literature to be included in the report: Questions about Dosage: What dosage of ephedra produce risk of CVD or other life threatening events? This may be because there is little or no data available.
If so, it should be made clear in the report.
The CANTOX report drew conclusions about a safe upper limit.
While these were based on the results of a single study, they were somewhat corroborated by others.
This is not to say that the CANTOX report is definitive.
Also not addressed: Do ephedra-containing dietary supplement products alter physiologic markers of cardiovascular function? This was addressed to the extent that RCT data in humans was identified.
Blood pressure and ventricular tachycardia were two physiologic measures of cardiac function included in the analysis.
These have been included in this revision.
Adding AER analyses of ephedra AERs in the published literature, ephedrine AERs from the FDA's Adverse Event Database, and those for seizure and would make the report more complete and well balanced.
While it's useful to analyze the controlled trials for evidence of adverse effects, we're not likely to find significant effects in them because if adverse events were that common the studies wouldn't have been permitted in the first place.
We must rely instead on case reports and adverse event reports for evidence.
Therefore, every effort should be made to assemble all the credible case reports and adverse event reports associated with ephedra use.
That was not done.
We disagree strongly with the contention that we did not expend every effort to obtain case reports.
We have extensive documentation of our efforts to identify and obtain case reports for this analysis.
Within the resources available to this project every possible effort was made.
The report should also make a better attempt at comparing This has been done in this revision.
the commonly reported adverse symptoms with those symptoms observed upon exposure to ephedra/ephedrine in controlled experiments.
If the symptoms are consistent, or inconsistent, that's important to know.
The case reports cited are difficult to evaluate as they We were limited by what was available in
A3-36
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment contain clinical terms incorrectly used, incomplete descriptions and use an algorithm for causality that is impractical and unrealistic when using FDA reports.
A vigorous documentation and search for better records at the time the case-reports were received would have improved the utility of the case reports.
We regard the handling of adverse consequences as incomplete and unrealistic.
The review by the Clinical Research and Review staff of the Center for Food Safety and Applied Nutrition of the Food and Drug Administration represents a more comprehensive and scientifically valid approach to reviewing adverse events associated with ephedra and ephedrine.
Overall Evaluation.
(i)The means used to evaluate the AERs is not clear.
It is difficult to determine what role, if any, the TEP actually played in the review process.
From the description given in the text, it would appear that most members of the TEP never even saw the AERs. (ii) It is not clear why an eight-week exclusion criteria was chosen the review of earlier safety studies.
The exclusion of doubleblind placebo control studies of less than 8 weeks duration resulted in the loss of valuable information about acute toxicity (and excluded most of the existing data not demonstrating toxicity). (iii) Important epidemiologic and scientific data has been omitted.
This omission severely limits the value of this study.
Question Formulation.
Questions are well formulated and easily understood.
All of the defects in the study, and there are many, stem from the methods used to answer the questions.
Study Identification.
Appropriate search criteria were not used.
Not all episodes of ephedra/ephedrine toxicity are a consequence of chronic exposure.
The exclusion of all studies of less than eight weeks duration may strengthen conclusions about effectiveness, but it weakens conclusions about safety.
There are, for example, dozens of double blind placebo control studies where clinically relevant doses of ephedrine were found to have no effect on blood pressure or cause arrhythmias, even in asthmatics with heart disease.
There is no reason to exclude such highly relevant data.
Studies where ephedrine was compared to placebo should not be excluded just because they were not about weight loss or athletic performance.
The scientific credibility of the report was weakened by the search strategy that was chosen.
Clearly, the authors of the report assume that (1) all episodes of ephedra/ephedrine toxicity are a consequence of chronic exposure, and that (2) clinical trials of ephedrine have been limited to studies assessing the effect of ephedrine on weight loss.
All these assumptions are easily shown to be incorrect.
Rand Response the files sent to us.
It is not within the EPC scope to "search for better records at the time the case reports were received."
We disagree that clinical terms are incorrectly used; in most circumstances we are reporting the clinical terms used in the source documents.
Finally, if there was agreement about the best "scientifically valid approach to reviewing adverse events" then there would exist standardized methods for so doing and we would not have received the same level of peer review comments that we did.
The trials of less than 8 weeks duration were not excluded from the safety analysis and epidemiologic studies were outside our scope of work.
No response
There is no assumption that chronic exposure is necessary and we did not assume that trials of ephedrine have been limited to studies of weight loss.
We do not agree that studies of safety in healthy adults are necessarily relevant to studies in obese individuals who are at greater risk for comorbid conditions.
A3-37
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response Data Synthesis.
The analysis of the weight loss achieved by We disagree.
We tested whether weight loss was linear over this time period and ephedrine versus placebo, and ephedrine plus caffeine we could not prove that it was not.
versus placebo etc., is very problematic because one has assumed that the weight loss rate is high initially and subsequently lowers, so that the weight loss from months 3 to 6 is typically very small.
It is therefore invalid to simply calculate the mean rate of weight loss as pounds weight loss per month when trials of very different duration are included.
Those who are familiar with placebo controlled weight loss and weight maintenance trials know that most of the difference between the active and placebo arms is achieved during the first 3 to 4 months, and that the difference is subsequently maintained even up to 2 years.
The way the data are handled in this report has therefore produced projections that severely underestimate the real efficacy of ephedrine and ephedrine plus caffeine.
This has been carried over into the conclusions, where it is stated that ephedrine/caffeine is not as effective as other antiobesity medications currently on the market.
Data Synthesis.
This must refer to Orlistat (the pancreatic lipase inhibitor from Roche) and Sibutramine (the centrally acting compound from Abbott).
If one looks at the long-term of Orlistat ones sees that the mean weight loss difference between Orlistat and placebo after 6 months to 2 years are of the order of between 2-5 kg in all the large trials.
Ephedrine plus caffeine produces at least an equivalent effect.
For example: If the weight loss on an active compound after 3 months is 10 pounds more than on placebo, and this result is maintained also after 6 months, it is clear that rate of weight loss would be calculated as 10 pounds divided by 3 (=3.33) if the trial is stopped at 3 months.
Whereas the result from a 6 month trial would give 10 pounds divided by 6 months (=1.67), which is exactly half of the weight loss.
This issue should be addressed and the efficacy section should be revised accordingly.
The way the panel has calculated the weight loss rate actually assumes that the weight loss rate is linear and that it continues at the same rate with prolonged use.
Obviously, this is not the case.
Data Synthesis.
I note that Astrup et al.
International Journal of Obesity 1992;16:269-77, listed in the bibliography (accepted articles) as number 1, is not included in the analysis! The Danish double publication of this is the Quaade et al., listed as number 48 in the same bibliography.
It is hard to see why the panel quotes the Quaade et al. publication in Danish, which a condensed version of the Astrup et al. paper, which I assume must be the paper the panel had taken the study information from in English.
The panel has used pounds in the analysis of weight loss, but it would be more appropriate to use weight loss in percent of initial body weight because the weight loss in pounds in not We were careful to state in the text that our results could not be extrapolated beyond 4-6 months.
We added data on other weight loss products for comparison.
We identified these two trials as reporting identical data, and the inclusion of either (but not both) should make no difference in the results.
Our practice is to include the most informative article.
For these reasons we note, a percent weight loss analysis has several limitations.
A3-38
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment independent of initial body weight.
This may introduce a bias if the initial body weight and body mass index in the 2 arms were not comparable.
Page vi. , paragraph 3; page vi, paragraph 4; page;4, paragraph 4; and page 30 last paragraph: Some may not classify anxiety, change in mood as psychiatric symptoms.
Emotional/ mood adverse effects might be more appropriate.
On page 55, the authors state "the effects of ephedrine and caffeine appear to be additive.
I do not understand the basis for the authors statement.
Unless there is a 2 x2 design in which to have the opportunity to observe an interaction between ephedrine and caffeine and observe that no such interaction occurs, how can the make a statement of additivity? I believe what they mean to state is that there is an effect of the combination of ephedrine and caffeine combined that is greater of the effect of either alone.
This is not that same thing as stating that the effect is additive.
On page VI, the authors state that there are no data from studies of herbal ephedra-containing dietary supplement products without caffeine.
This is not correct.
There is at least one study.
My colleagues and presented an abstract at the 2002 Experimental Biology meeting from suck a trial.
Unfortunately, we did not present efficacy data.
Moreover, I had thought the community sponsoring the study had provided the safety data to the NIH for this review.
Although, it is not within my authority to release the data themselves, I can certainly provide the authors a copy of the poster presented if they do not have access to it.
There is no published study of the efficacy of ephedra without caffeine, but a large, industry-sponsored study was done by Coffey et al. at the 2002 Experimental Biology Meeting the authors reported that there had been no adverse events, but did not report on efficacy.
I think you did an excellent job in collating the important available data.
No Response Psychiatrists may disagree with the statement that anxiety and change in mood are not psychiatric symptoms.
No change made.
The reviewer is correct.
We clarified the language so that we do not imply the effects are "additive" in the arithmetic sense.
Rand Response
Without efficacy data we cannot include this in the analysis.
We did not receive this study in response to our requests to industry for unpublished studies.
The Danish study reports a 100% increase on post-exercise On further review, we determined the O2 consumption by 100%.
Was that immediately after Danish study was not relevant to the report exercise and for how long, this seems like a very big since it did not report differences in increase are you sure this is correct? If you are unclear performance between groups.
have Mary Hardy send me this paper and I will have a look at it.
A3-39
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment As far as athletic performance goes, no studies were available on herbal ephedra and only a modest affect on "very short-term immediate performance" was observed with ephedrine, only when caffeine was co-administered.
The report states that there was one study that assessed the effect of "sustained use of ephedrine on performance over time", an " reported that the addition of caffeine to ephedrine necessary to produce an effect on athletic performance."
But in the structured abstract it is not made clear what the extent of the effect was.
The report text states on pg. 57, however, that "a study116 published in Denmark concluded that aerobic training enhanced the effect of ephedrine on energy expenditure.
After, 8 weeks of aerobic conditioning, ephedrine increased post-exercise energy expenditure by 100%.
N. B.
The reference numbers in the section are incorrect e.g. ref 116 cited above should be 43, 115:52 Regarding the 1986 Denmark study ­ do you mean that ephedra increased energy expenditure during exercise, or that it increased energy expenditure after the completion of exercise? Please clarify.
Were there a disproportionate number of case reports of adverse events that occurred during or after the performance of exercise training or physical activity? The conclusions regarding herbal ephedra for weight loss are reasonable and defensible as far as they go, but are too conservative.
Saying that there is no evidence for sustained weight loss with use of these preparations for more than 3-4 months is true, but does not translate into conclusions that are useful for the clinician or regulatory agencies.
The data presented and summarized support the use of herbal ephedra or ephedra + caffeine for weight loss.
Important parameters were properly identified and addressed, such as study population and design.
In general, the appropriate study parameters were examined.
However, I would have liked more data on doseresponse, especially with the efficacy trials Most of the important parameters were systematically addressed.
Should a descriptive statement be made on possible nonstatistical publication bias.
For example, funding source for the published clinical trials may also bias the quality of the results (see BMJ 2002;325 (August 3):249).
On re-examination we determined this study should have been excluded, as it did not measure the effect of ephedrine on physical activity but rather on basal metabolic rate.
Not assessed, and probably not possible to assess.
Our charge was to present the evidence.
Translating the evidence into clinical recommendations or regulatory decisions is specifically beyond the scope of the EPC.
Rand Response
No Response A dose response analysis is included in this revision No Response This was added to the limitations.
There should be an expanded general statement regarding This was added to the limitations.
the medical exclusion criteria that are used in all the published clinical trials.
This needs to be emphasized in the analysis and should specifically point out that many patients
A3-40
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment with underlying diseases (hypertension, heart failure...etc) were excluded from trials.
The emphasis is needed due to common argument that safety data from clinical trials do not support the potential serious adverse reactions collected by FDA.
None of the information provided addressed analytical We included this information where it was methods with the ephedrine or herbal ephedra products available.
used (e.g., certificate of analysis verification that the product used in the study met label claim) and other issues of quality.
I think you did a good job in defining the methods you would No Response use in appraising the studies.
Open label treatment following a controlled clinical trial is often thought to be a way to screen for safety, but I understand how incorporating that into your assessment might inject bias due to lack of a control group.
Although caffeine and ephedrine has been evaluated in a controlled clinical trial for 6 months followed by an additional 6 months of open label treatment, I understand the statement that trials do not last more than 6 months refers to the double blind period.
The studies that were obtained for review were evaluated No Response carefully.
Objective criteria were established prior for inclusion into the planned meta-analyses.
The evaluation of the case studies provided by FDA was also performed in an objective manner.
The limited number of studies on exercise and athletic performance are presented objectively.
The limitations of these studies is accurately noted.
It appears that a thorough search for relevant data was undertaken.
I can find no evidence of bias or intentional inclusion/omission of data or search strategies.
Criteria for clinical study inclusion and exclusion were well defined and adhered to.
Little bias seemed to be introduced by the selection process, at least for the clinical studies.
All important relevant studies were evaluated.
No Response Rand Response
No Response
The inclusion and exclusion criteria for the selection of We contacted Dr. Waddington but did not articles is adequate.
I am unaware that any crucial data is receive any data from him. lacking; however, it would be helpful if Dr. Phil Waddington's data from Canada could be included in the final report.
Should the search term "adverse reaction" be part of the Generally, these terms act as "limiters" and strategy? If not, why not? Please see my comments on would exclude studies if they were not funding source of the clinical trial.
In an ideal situation, a trial tagged in this fashion.
We prefer not to funded by a neutral party will probably yield the most unlimit the search in this way.
Since tagging bias information.
articles is not always accurate and we did not want to prematurely exclude potentially relevant studies.
We did include "adverse events" as text search terms.
There were appropriate inclusion and exclusion criteria for This revision includes the results of a few
A3-41
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment the studies selected for the meta-analysis and these were clearly stated and explained.
There may have been some bias based on the studies selected, even though the inclusion criteria were clearly spelled out.
This was mentioned in the Limitations section of the report.
Efforts were made to identity unpublished studies and several studies were missed in the evaluation as they had not been received.
The researchers indicated that they will be considered for future assessment.
When this will occur is unclear.
Rand Response additional studies that are relevant.
We do not judge that any of the handful of requested but unretrieved articles are RCTs.
The discussion of the results of the weight loss trials makes The mean attrition rate was not higher in no mention of doses.
Doses should be mentioned either in the active treatment group.
This has been the text or in the table.
It is stated that "all of these studies added to the results had an attrition rate of greater than 20%..."
Was the attrition rate higher in the active vs. placebo treatment group? This should be clarified.
If the rates were higher in the active group, which I suspect, then a specific analysis should be done as to the cause of attrition.
Athletic Performance, second paragraph.
Please clarify the duration of the exercise test.
This is important because some drugs (like creatine) may produce benefit with short duration exercise (a few seconds) but not longer duration exercise.
The originally proposed key questions included inquiries regarding dosage levels if ephedra with respect to weight loss, athletic performance, and safety.
The Report does not address dosage levels with respect to weight loss, athletic performance, and safety assessment (except for the mention of possible future research study).
Clearly this is an extremely important concept, and issue, regarding to these materials, especially with respect to the review of case reported obtained from the passive AE reporting system.
It is our view that the general omission of dosage considerations should be mentioned with regard to the AER case report reviews and that it receive some attention in weight loss and athletic performance assessments.
Are all of these studies single dose studies? What was the interval between taking the dietary supplement and the performance of the exercise test? The exercise tests varied in duration from short (weight lifting) to an hour or more (endurance).
A dose analysis was added to the RCT portion of the report.
We did not judge analysis to be possible in the case report portion of the report.
This has been clarified in the results.
The meaning of this sentence is obscure.
What is meant by This sentence has been reworded. "enhanced mechanisms of heat loss?" See page 26: none of the weight loss studies were beyond 4 months.
Therefore, I would rewrite the first paragraph of the Main Results to say the "longest published weight loss intervention was 4 months".
If there was a study with a post-intervention follow-up then this should be stated as well.
(See comments for page 5) Three studies had 6 months of treatment, which was too few to perform metaanalysis on this time period specifically.
For studies that reported only 6 month data, we included these in the "4 month" time point, and specified in the methods section in the report that this could include data out to 6 months Hence the "4 - 6
A3-42
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response months" statements in the text.
On page 3 there is mention that 19 of the 48 controlled trials were excluded from pooled analysis because they had follow up of less than eight weeks.
There should be some description of the findings of these studies in this report.
It may not be standard format for the EPC's to cite patient numbers at this early point in a report, but to make sure readers understand what a small number of people have actually been studied in controlled trials, it would be helpful to include this near the beginning of the report.
Figure 2, question 18: Chemical analysis of ephedrine alkaloids was part of the quality review form, but data for individual studies are not provided.
Given the variability of herbal ephedra, if chemical analysis was not performed in a particular study, does that call into question the results of the study? These studies were excluded on the advice of our TEP.
To as evidence of efficacy would inappropriate in our view.
We them in our safety analysis.
as evidence discuss them be did include
This was added to the report in the safety assessment, where the possibility of a type II error is increased due to low numbers of studied patients.
We do not think so since the results for the ephedra studies were remarkably consistent.
"In order to improve health outcomes, long-term weight loss No, we meant maintenance of weight loss, is necessary."
Do you really mean that long-term follow-up since the relationship to health outcomes would be necessary to determine health outcomes? is known.
We have clarified this.
Page 53: Results Section.
Weight loss.
It might be helpful to provide a table of 5 types of comparison studies indicating sample size in each trial and the power calculations for each.
It is important to highlight when sample sizes are small and individual power calculations are insufficient.
"Use of ephedrine, ephedrine + coffee, or dietary supplements containing Ephedra and herbs with caffeine is associated with a statistically significant increase in weight loss (compared to placebo) over relatively short periods of time (no more than a few months)."
Please Clarify "(no more than a few months)".
We assume you are not saying that the data show loss of effect after a few months, just that the studies don't extend beyond a few months.
It would be helpful to define what is meant by "sufficient evidence."
Considering that we pooled data, we do not think the addition of our assessment of power of individual studies is very useful.
We did include this in specific circumstances where it seemed warranted.
The data cannot be extrapolated beyond a few months.
We have clarified this.
We earlier explained the reason for the "4 ­ 6" month designation.
This is defined as statistically significant.
Several of the preliminary questions provided to RAND have We now include a dose analysis in this not been addressed in the report.
We expected a review of revision.
the literature to be included in the report: Questions about Dosage: I. What dosage levels of ephedra are necessary to achieve weight loss? When describing the efficacy studies, it might be helpful to include a table delineating the key elements of the weight loss studies: Dietary prescriptions, Description of subject characteristics, Mean weight or BMI at initiation of study, and inclusion and exclusion criteria for studies.
Although ephedrine is the chemical drug that has been We considered this change or addition but decided there were already a great deal of tables and therefore we did not add this table.
We are sympathetic to this comment but
A3-43
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment found to be effective in short-term weight loss and athletic performance, this result cannot be extrapolated to the herb ephedra that contains multi chemical components.
In order to study the efficacy of herb ephedra, the amount of ephedrine present in the herb ephedra being tested must be precisely defined.
This `ephedrine' must be pure ephedrine and not, say, 50% ephedrine with 25% pseudoephedrine and 25% norephedrine or other related or unrelated alkaloids, as are normally present in herb ephedra.
Ephedra is not ephedrine and vice versa, even though ephedrine is one of ephedra's active components.
I personally don't see how one can generate meaningful results from a study using a material, such as ephedra, which is not clearly defined.
There are just too many variables.
Good science requires a well-defined test material.
For example, we would never accept a singlechemical drug like cortisone with even 25% impurities when performing a clinical trial on cortisone.
Why should we accept the chemical drug, ephedrine, present in herb ephedra, whose concentration can vary by 300% (from 30% to 90%, with the balance composed of other alkaloids)!? Until this problem (which is not insurmountable, as product definition criteria have been and can be set)5 is resolved, any studies on herb ephedra for weight loss or athletic performance (both based on ephedrine) will not yield meaningful results.
It is possible that some of the papers the RAND report selected do clearly define the ephedrine content in the herb ephedra (though I seriously doubt it), the fact still remains that there are related and unrelated alkaloids also present in addition to ephedrine.
For example, if a product containing an ephedra extract has been analyzed to contain specifically 20mg ephedrine per tablet/capsule to conform to the required amount of ephedrine for efficacy, what happens to the other alkaloids also present, which could easily be twice the ephedrine amount, or 40mg, making the total alkaloids content 60mg? This is a natural scenario unless made `unnatural' by manufacturers or suppliers who take spent ephedra herb (from which all alkaloids have been extracted) or a token amount of ephedra herb and add the prescribed amount of ephedrine, thus rendering the product basically a singlecomponent drug (ephedrine), formulated with inert spent ephedra or token ephedra herb as carrier/excipient.
In this `unnatural' case, the `ephedra' product is basically an ephedrine drug dosage form and has nothing to do with the herb ephedra.
I doubt there is any published scientific information on herb ephedra based on sound scientific definition of the test products containing ephedra.
Furthermore, whatever reports available most likely have not clearly identified and characterized their test materials Rand Response believe that the consistency of our findings supports the decision to pool studies of weight loss and compare ephedra to ephedrine.
A3-44
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment hence rendering their findings of little value to us.
Based on the current state of published information in this field, I don't believe we will be able to obtain meaningful conclusions relating to herb ephedra's toxicity through adverse events analysis alone or based on modern published experimental data.
In case of the former, since no precise standards are required for commercial ephedra products, few if any of the reported adverse events can be reasonably traced to ephedra herb.
In case of the latter, there are simply too few useful published reports whose findings are based on work that used well characterized and well-define ephedra.
Modern medicine and traditional Chinese medicine are two parallel and distinctly different healthcare systems, each has its own merits and defects.
While modern medicine is based on scientific experimentation, TCM is based on empirical practice and trial and error in humans over time.
The latter has accumulated a vast amount of recorded information, including cautions and contraindications.
This has been an ongoing process and it continues to accumulate data as TCM practice continues to generate them.
It would be our loss if this valuable resource was not somehow utilized.
Since herb ephedra has a long use history in traditional Chinese medicine with an extensively documented record (safety, cautions, contraindications, etc.) over a 2000-year period, this should be taken into consideration.
Also, common TCM traditional practice should be heeded.
For example, some of the adverse events reportedly due to herb ephedra alone may not be so at all, but rather due to the concurrent and inappropriate use of other common herbs such as Asian ginseng which is traditionally cautioned against use in healthy persons with a vigorous (yang) constitution and which has been known to cause serious toxicity, including death when used improperly.
6 If one combines the indiscriminate use of even such common herbal tonics as Asian ginseng with a relatively potent herbal drug like ephedra as dietary supplements, to be used daily with no prominent warnings or precautions, serious adverse effects are bound to occur.
In order to meaningfully study or evaluate the safety and efficacy of traditional medicines such as ephedra (not ephedrine, the chemical), apart from ensuring that the ephedra has been well characterized and defined, we should also consider taking its historical record and its traditional use context into consideration as well as keeping an eye open to the simultaneous but inappropriate (outside of tradition) use of tonics such as Asian ginseng.
Furthermore, we should keep an open mind to the possibility that the efficacy and safety of herbal medicines simply cannot be determined by Western `hard' science alone.
Common sense and welldocumented historical use and safety data should constitute Rand Response
A3-45
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment part of the evaluation protocol.
Regarding safety or adverse effects of ephedrine and herb ephedra, the two drugs need to be evaluated separately.
With ephedrine, there should not be much of a problem because there must be copious amounts of data on the drug ephedrine, which can be accessed in various databases.
However, with ephedra herb, it is quite different.
Since ephedra has not entered the market through the usual drugdevelopment-and-approval route, which would have generated toxicity data during that process, evaluating its safety as if it were a standard pharmaceutical (the singlechemical drug ephedrine) is not appropriate.
There are few modern scientific or clinical reports published in the field.
You are to be commended for the comprehensive search you conducted.
Your methods seemed well-defined and unbiased.
I think you did an excellent job of selecting articles using specific criteria and limiting bias.
I know that one of the major issues prompting this review was concern regarding the safety profile of caffeine and ephedrine.
In the United States this combination is sold in an unregulated fashion, so the only estimate of the denominator for adverse events is the number of doses manufactured.
In Denmark, caffeine and ephedrine is a prescription preparation for the treatment of obesity.
Orlistat and, before 1997, dexfenfluramine were approved prescription drugs in Denmark competing with caffeine and ephedrine.
I assume that sibutramine is also approved in that country, but I do not know that for sure.
It may be too late to at this point to include in this report, but information must exist for the incidence of reported adverse events to obesity drugs in Denmark.
Although this is not a perfect way to assess safety, it might be useful to determine the relative incidence of serious adverse events reported with various prescription obesity drugs in Denmark.
Based on conversations with individuals familiar with the Danish experience, I suspect that the safety of caffeine and ephedrine would compare favorably with sibutramine.
One advantage of such an analysis is that one would be comparing alternative drugs for treatment of obesity in the same population.
The second advantage would be a better estimate of the denominator based on prescriptions written rater than manufactured pills.
For the RCT data, the numbers of patients studied with ephedra have been too small to assess adverse events without a high probability of a type II error.
For the case report analysis, we did separate ephedrine from ephedra.
Rand Response
No response
It was beyond our resources to obtain safety data (other than published data) from Denmark.
We added to the future research that this would be a good study to undertake.
A3-46
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Denmark Experience.
Ephedrine/caffeine combinations are used extensively in Denmark for weight control purposes.
There is a long history and experience that should be considered by RAND.
Dr. Astrup has indicated that there are very few adverse event reports associated with such products in Denmark.
RAND should contact the Denmark health authority, and/or Dr. Astrup, in order to obtain more information regarding these reports - and should include this information and Denmark experience in the final report.
With regard to the adverse event reports, significant amounts of information were often missing; however that was not the fault of the authors, but rather a shortcoming of the MEDWATCH program.
If anything the study highlights the inadequacy of voluntary reporting systems for adverse health effects and the confusion that results when a "systematic" analysis is attempted on such data.
It is well known among the legal community and the FDA that thousands of adverse events have been reported to ephedra supplement manufacturers.
Access to these reports might have affected the outcome of the present study.
If anything these additional reports would have magnified the gravity of the public health threat attributable to ephedra-containing supplements.
Moreover, Poison Control Centers throughout the country also log calls on ephedra supplements.
Were attempts were made to access these additional resources? There was a thorough search of relevant articles using 9 electronic databases.
Both national and international journals were included and the searches appeared to capture most of the relevant studies.
The majority of the accepted articles for the meta-analysis were from the U.S.
It seemed that 3 were from Germany.
There were no studies from Asian journals.
Table 19, I do not understand the point of this table or the conclusions being drawn.
Please clarify for the simple minded.
We did not contact Poison Control Centers.
We did include in this revision an assessment of the reports made to one manufacturer.
Rand Response
No response
We have added text to explain this table.
The point is the later cases, that we did not have access to, contained proportionately more deaths.
Timing of last ephedrine (ephedra) dose? If it was 
Is have been assessed.
timing of last dose with a tox screen negative test taken into consideration when determining causality? Insert percentage next to the # of adverse events for easier direct comparison of the placebo and intervention groups Instead of the 5x4 (nxn) test, it may be better to perform the chi-square test on event type vs. data type, ie. death (vs. other) x data type (2x3), stroke x type, etc.
We do not feel this comparison is justified due to small sample sizes, that is why we did not perform meta-analysis.
We are not sure what this comment applies to.
A3-47
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment There were clear criteria used to select studies for inclusion in the report.
The appropriate criteria were used to assess the studies on efficacy of weight loss with ephedra or ephedra/caffeine.
Rand Response No response No response
The initial draft failed to include a review of the published These published case reports are now case reports of adverse events.
Given that these case included in this revision.
reports were published in peer-reviewed medical journals and are prepared by medical professionals, they are likely to contain data that is more complete, accurate, and of scientific merit.
It would seem more appropriate for these reports to have been evaluated and included in this report, especially since no other entity has conducted a review of them, than to once again include an evaluation of the FDA's evaluation.
Currently one must read to page 54 to get an answer to the This information is in the appropriate place key question, "We interpret this data as indicating the use of for an EPC evidence report.
ephedra is associated with a statistically significant 1.3 pounds of weight loss per month more than is associated with placebo for up to four months of use" and "We interpret these data as indicating that the use of ephedrine and caffeine is associated with a statistically significant 2.2 pound weight loss per month more than is associated with placebo up to four months duration."
This should be in the very beginning of the report.
The 19 efficacy studies not pooled in the analysis because they had a duration of less than 8 weeks, and the 9 studies eliminated for a variety of reasons should be accounted for in the document, and any serious adverse event reports described should be included in the report.
These studies were included in the safety analysis.
We added that these events would be "Even in aggregate the clinical trials only enrolled sufficient number (how many?) of patients to detect a serious adverse classified as "rare."
event rate of one per one thousand."
And again on page 58: "For studies of ephedra, there was only sufficient statistical power in aggregate to detect a rate of serious adverse events if three in one thousand."
For the reader, it would be helpful to know how these event rates, 1/1000 and 3/1000 compare with those reported in the literature for drugs in the same usage category as ephedra (three billion servings in 1999), i.e. to HRT (approx, 3.8/1000 women has an MI or developed breast cancer), or to event rates for aspirin and GI bleed.
References 104 and 108: The Nasser study (ref.108) is the same as the first Boozer study (ref.104).
This duplicate study has now been removed from the pooled analysis.
Under Bibliography Accepted Articles, pp 135 ­137, This duplicate study has now been references 12 and 41 are the same study [12=published removed from the pooled analysis.
study, 41 = published abstract], leaving 4 studies that assessed the effect of ephedra + herbal caffeine.
Data reported in Chapter 3 Results including Table 14 will need
A3-48
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment to be corrected and re-analyzed.
Monthly Weight Loss.
In your results section you report the data as "Monthly" weight loss.
The rationale for this escapes me.
Weight loss with all medications slows with time and a plateau is reached between 4 and 6 months.
Thus, the most rapid weight loss occurs in the first month.
In trials that last 6 months, the only weight loss will be slower than one that lasts 2 months.
How do we compare them with this criterion? Miscellaneous Comments.
On page 11, the draft report acknowledge that the "estimate of use of ephedra containing products may be low."
Despite this, the report fails to emphasize denominator-related concerns associated with adverse event report reviews.
This major scientific weakness needs to be acknowledged as part of the adverse event report analysis in a manner similar to that used in prior AHRQ studies (such as the Garlic Report).
On page 29, the draft report indicates that although certain studies did not record any data for certain even category or indeed any adverse events at all, such studies were not included in the adverse event meta-analysis as RAND did not assume zero observed events if a study did not mention a particular type of event.
Is this approach consistent with most scientific reviews? The Garlic Report.
The draft report, as noted above, is in many ways inconsistent with prior AHRQ reports that address adverse event case reports.
The AHRQ Garlic Report (Garlic: Effects on Cardiovascular Risks and Disease, Protective Effects Against Cancer, and Clinical Adverse Effects), and statements contained in the Garlic Report, should be reviewed by RAND as a potential model for the ephedra report - particularly in the manner case reports are assessed and described.
For example, the Garlic Report provides the following with regard to adverse event reports and confounding factors: Adverse effects of oral ingestion of garlic are "smelly" breath and body odor.
Other possible, but not proven, adverse effects include flatulence, esophageal and abdominal pain, small intestinal obstruction, contact dermatitis, rhinitis, asthmas, bleeding, and myocardial infarction...The frequency of adverse effects with oral ingestion of garlic and whether they vary by particular preparations are not established...Furthermore, the causality of the adverse effects was not clear, except for the breath and body odor, and the expected frequency of adverse effects was not determined...
In addition to the RCTs, 73 studies were found that addressed diverse effects.
Most (97 percent) were case reports or small case series (Evidence Table 9).
The literature reviewed gives a limited picture of adverse effects We tested, given the data available in these trials, whether weight loss differed across the different months.
We could find no evidence that it did.
Therefore, within the limited time frames of these trials (4 months), we included all relevant data points, as it increased our statistical power.
We did assume zero events for serious events like death or stroke even if they were not recorded in the RCT.
We did not do so for other events because we could ever know whether those events were sought by the investigators if they were not recorded.
In other words, we did not assume zero for the entire universe of adverse events, only for those specifically mentioned and sought and recorded as zero.
This is consistent with most high quality scientific reviews.
Rand Response
The inclusion criteria and reporting of studies in the Garlic Report were shaped by their TEP and their Partners.
The inclusion criteria and reporting of studies in our ephedra report were shaped by our TEP and our Partners.
There is no requirement that these reports be the same in inclusion and reporting.
A3-49
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment attributable to garlic for many reasons.
First, searching for studies that report adverse effects is difficult.
Many studies may mention adverse effects in passing, but do not use adverse effects as a key index word or in their abstracts.
If these studies do not otherwise meet selection criteria in a review, they will be missed.
Second, in most case reports and case series, adverse effects cannot be directly attributed to garlic because chance, coincidence, or confounding factors could have been responsible for the adverse effect.
For example, alternative causes of reported adverse effects were possible in 22 percent of the reviewed studies and could not be excluded definitively in 69 percent.
Third, case reports and case series may miss delayed adverse reactions because such associations are more difficult to make than those that occur immediately after garlic is administered.
Fourth, although case reports and case series can provide qualitative information about the nature of an adverse effect, incidence cannot be estimated from such evidence...
The frequency and severity of adverse effects that are related to garlic should be quantified.
Whether adverse effects are specific to particular preparations, constituents, and doses of garlic should be elucidated.
Whether certain adverse effects are unique to particular types of garlic exposure (e.g. inhaled, oral, or topical) should be clarified.
The most serious potential adverse effects of garlic that have been cited are complications related to bleeding.
Whether particular preparations and constituents of garlic affect physiological parameters related to bleeding such as platelet adhesiveness, prothrombin time, and partial thromboplastin time, as well as whether particular preparations lead to clinically significant bleeding, warrants more study.
(emphasis added).
The limitations of the review process are not stated.
You have adverse reactions and inconclusive studies on the effectiveness of ephedra/caffeine.
That leaves us with insufficient information to make an assessment of either safety or efficacy.
In the data synthesis, the impression is given that there is more precision than can be justified based on the nature of the data.
Possible bias of the report due to members of the TEP and literature captured.
Limitations and quality of the studies and short-term studies used in the systematic review.
Combining the systematic review by meta-analysis with the analysis of AERs.
No conclusions for herbal ephedra and weight loss.
The AERs evaluated were limited to those provided by FDA.
AERs from the studies were not reviewed.
Report did not emphasize any potential benefits of ephedra/ephedrine and weight loss.
We disagree with regard to the reviewers comments on precision.
Precision is determined mostly by sample size and number of studies.
We believe our pooled results adequately reflect the degree of precision the data allow.
The AERs from other sources are now included in this revision.
We disagree that the report did not emphasize the potential benefits of ephedra/ ephedrine use and weight loss.
The other limitations are noted.
Rand Response
A3-50
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Reference 29 can provide a national estimate of 2.5 million individuals using ephedra wt loss products (during 19961998), which is probably an underestimate since 33% of one-states respondents did not know that their nonprescription weight loss product contained ephedra.
Some of the questions guiding the evidence report were not answered but are available in the literature search and data collection.
For example, the question regarding the dosage level of ephedra necessary to achieve weight loss was not answer.
There is no summary statement on the dose of ephedra or ephedrine other than Evidence Table 1 and 2.
Rand Response The imprecision noted by the reviewer even in this one estimate is, we believe, good reason to avoid its use in trying to calculate a rate using case reports.
A dose analysis is included in this revision.
Conclusions regarding the efficacy of ephedra-containing No Response supplements in promoting weight loss and the enhancement of exercise performance were supported by the available data.
The conclusions are clearly and concisely laid out and are consistent with the evidence presented.
The conclusions of the efficacy of ephedrine and related compounds are valid for the short term studies evaluated and conclude that longer term studies need to be conducted.
The remaining conclusions are valid and appropriate.
For the efficacy and minor adverse effect evaluations, the evidence does support the conclusions.
Finally, there was no demonstrable effect of sustained ephedrine supplementation on strength training.
According to the report, caffeine appears to enhance the effect of ephedrine yet there is no mention of assessing caffeine in the diet.
This would have to be done in a casecontrol study.
It may be appropriate to add this separate bullet under conclusions.
No Response No Response
No Response No Response The need to control for caffeine intake was added to a bullet in the conclusion.
Bullet 1: Conclusion of "sufficient evidence" should be Changes made to bullets.
tempered with reference doses used and duration of treatment in the studies.-Bullet 2: This is just a statement not a conclusion.
It would become a conclusion by adding that out of 1848 cases known, 1344 were selected for review and of these, 158 showed serious adverse events.
Within this subset of 158 reports, 11 were identified in which ephedra was possibly causal.
Conclusions section should be able to stand alone.
This would require adding more detail including doses and duration.
It is generally acknowledged in the field of obesity research that any study with less than a 2-year follow-up is misleading and not relevant to the evaluation of the antiobesity modality under investigation.
The reason for this is that most individuals regain lost weight on any diet, drug or weight loss program after 24 months There were no longWe believe the text is clear that these results cannot be extrapolated beyond four months.
The data support a linear relationship for weight loss over 4 months in these studies.
A3-51
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment term weight loss studies of ephedra or ephedrine reviewed in this report, yet a mathematical formula for weight loss associated with ephedra was presented.
This seems highly speculative and hard to defend.
The conclusion that shortterm weight loss can be achieved with herbal ephedra and caffeine rest on studies of herbal concoctions that are not adequately characterized, chemically and pharmacologically, to permit pooling of studies; The attempt to quantitate the weight loss per month attributed to the use of ephedra-containing herbs is invalid.
Further, the model assumes constant weight loss over time, an unlikely outcome.
The need to add caffeine to ephedrine to produce any measurable degree of enhanced athletic performance suggests caffeine alone may suffice to achieve this effect, which, in any event, is evident for only short time periods.
The reviewer is incorrect, since one study reported in the athletic performance section compared ephedrine, caffeine, and their combination, and reported only the ephedrine/caffeine combination produced an effect.
This result refutes the reviewer's hypothesis that caffeine alone may suffice.
The literature cases are now included in this revision.
Rand Response
It seemed that the decision to review FDA adverse event reports produced very little useful information and was almost a duplicate effort given Haller and Benowitz study.
It may be more useful to use the same strategy on the case studies reported in the literature.
The bullet point "Scientific studies (not additional case reports) are necessary..." should be deleted as this is not the conclusion of the Adverse Consequences but rather Future Research, which has been stated already.
Dr. Leung made the point that there were thousands of Chinese literature on the Ma Huang, and if it wasn't safe the literature would say so.
The literature comments that some people should not take it, but there is a lot of information to show that it is safe.
Dr. Leung also made a point on the credibility of this information by stating that for other herbs the literature shows they are not safe.
We think it important to also include this as a conclusion.
We do not disagree that there may be extensive Chinese literature on MaHuang but we did not find controlled trials in our literature search, nor was this literature offered to us by any of the many reviewers of this report.
Furthermore, we believe that there is ample evidence to support that the most valid conclusions come from properly designed hypothesis testing studies, not a collection of anecdotal literature, either supporting or refuting safety.
I disagree with the safety conclusion of this report for two We added to the limitations the issue of reasons: select patient populations.
It was outside 1.
The clinical trials excluded patients at risk, thereby our scope to assess other chemicals.
reducing the study's ability to detect harmful effects of the drugs.
2.
The totality of prior pharmacologic information was ignored in the analyses of the FDA cases.
The consistency between the type of events reported and the known actions of ephedrine to increase heart rate and blood pressure must contribute to the assessment of causality The similarity of
A3-52
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment the reports seen with similar chemicals, e.g. phenylpropanolamine, must be given consideration.
The cases that the authors classify as "possibly caused" by ephedrine/caffeine I would classify as "probably caused by" ephedrine/caffeine.
I believe the second bullet under "Adverse Consequences" (page 112) is unclear and unqualified.
This statement reads, "There have been a great number of adverse event reports filed with FDA regarding herbal ephedra-containing dietary supplements."
I find this statement unqualified and unhelpful.
A great number of reports compared to what? ­ Total dietary supplements sales? The number of AER's reported for other dietary supplements? The statement should be better qualified, in my judgment.
The first bullet on page 113 is a very key issue and I believe deserves further comments.
I agree with the conclusion that, given the rarity of serious adverse events associated with ephedra, properly designed case controlled studies would be appropriate.
However, I believe it will be difficult to develop such a properly designed case controlled study, as the underlying factors (that appear to be idiosyncratic) are not well understood.
How, then, would a case controlled study be designed to take such unquantifiable factors into account? This is precisely the continuing problem in deciding how best to approach both the regulation of and further scientific research into ephedra The conclusions seemed fair and stated appropriately.
I would suggest adding a section answering the questions you posed at the start of the report in a summary fashion.
Most of the studies reviewed were on synthetic ephedrine and weight loss, therefore, a relationship between herbal ephedra and weight loss cannot be made and this appears problematic.
The clinical data that were examined only included ephedra in combination with another herbal stimulant.
While it is true that many weight loss products contain a combination of ingredients, not all do (NNFA's database of ma hang or ephedra reveals that almost half of the products do not contain another stimulant).
A concern is that the conclusions drawn in the report may be applied to all ephedra products, regardless of use and regardless of whether other ingredients are present.
It seems important to mention that apparently healthy individuals have died from the use of these products, possibly related to exacerbation of previously undetected disease.
And, because these products are available without prescription, and not even regulated as OTC drugs, the risk associated with unsupervised use are potentially greater than with drug formulations of ephedrine.
The conclusions of adverse consequences are internally We believe 2000 is "a great number" by most people's definition and have not made any changes.
Rand Response
It is beyond the scope of an EPC evidence report to go into such details of study design.
We note, however, that others have made detailed proposals to governmental agencies for just such a study.
We organized our bullets to follow the order of the questions.
We now include one RCT of ephedra without caffeine.
We have limited the conclusions to only those concoctions studied.
We have added to the conclusions and limitations both of these points.
We disagree since the finding of serious
A3-53
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment inconsistent.
Once the limitations are listed, then the number of serious adverse events (death, stroke, and myocardial infarction) should not be enumerated.
This is the same thing as saying that results of a scientific study are not statistically significant and then still enumerating them in the conclusion.
The most important conclusion is listed second to last on Page 113 and should be moved up to the front of the conclusion section of the report.
That is, scientific studies (not additional case reports) are necessary.
I disagree that a case-control study would be the next step.
Rather I would recommend strongly a prospectively randomized controlled study design with appropriate data safety and monitoring in place.
A population-based study will have the same drawbacks as the phenylpropanolamine study and will have the same risk of spurious associations rather than cause and effect relationships.
An intervention study and not an epidemiologic study is needed to clarify the situation.
As already stated, it is clear that the evidence does not support the conclusions.
The adverse event reports are that they are.
The attempts to connect them to the use Ephedra/Caffeine remain unconvincing both in this report and in the New England Journal of Medicine article.
Rand Response adverse events in otherwise healthy young people is a cause for concern.
We also disagree that the phenylpropanolamine study found a "spurious" association.
We note that a case control study is the accepted study design to quickly assess a possible relationship between an exposure and rare adverse events.
Specific issues related to ephedra are not addressed We clarified that the use of ephedrine to adequately, and notions for which there is no proof are raise blood pressure intraoperatively is presented as if they were accepted scientific fact.
For with parenteral use.
example, in the Pharmacology section, the report states "ephedrine increases peripheral resistance and can lead to a sustained raise in blood pressure...Elevations in blood pressure appear to be dose dependent in humans.
However, does under 50 mg do not always result in increased blood pressure."
The report fails to state that the sustained raises seen in hypotensive patients occur after the intravenous, not oral administration of ephedrine.
The only citation for the dose dependency of an ephedrinerelated rise in pressure is a review article, and that article does NOT say that ephedrine causes hypertension! It says, ephedrine and caffeine cause a greater increase in systolic pressure than ephedrine alone, that there is no effect on diastolic pressure, and that hemodynamic effects are transient.
The statement is quoted out of context and is therefore misleading.
The way the sentence is written, readers would be likely to assume that, even though "doses under 50 mg do not always result in increased blood pressure, a series of double-blind, placebo control trials have shown that at most the effects of oral ephedrine on blood pressure are negligible (as opposed to intravenous dosing used b anesthesiologists).
A partial listing of some of these studies is cited here [10-23].
The lack of effect on blood pressure is even supported by the list of TEP "accepted articles" cited in
A3-54
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment the bibliography.
All of the cited articles were from controlled clinical trials, and none reported clinically significant blood pressure elevations.
These studies should be included as part of the RAND review, and the statements regarding increases in blood pressure should be substantially revised.
Indeed, if the authors of the report cannot cite published, double-blind placebo control studies showing that taking oral ephedra/ephedrine significantly increase blood pressure, that that claim should not be included in the report.
Suggested directions for research were provided, but they are narrow in scope and may suggest "gaps" that do not really exist.
To date, more than 2000 ephedra/ephedrine users have been enrolled in clinical trials.
Given the consistently benign results of all the previous trials, are still more trials needed before the issue is put to rest? On the other hand, cutting edge issues in obesity-related research are completely ignored.
Does ephedrine interact with uncoupling protein? Does use of ephedra supplements have any effect on the production of inflammatory cytokines by adipose tissue? Or upon lepton homeostasis? On Lipotoxicity? If supplement manufacturers are to be believed, they have thousands of testimonials from satisfied users reporting weight losses of 50 pounds or more.
Why not study these individuals and compare them with other product users who were unable to achieve weight loss? Having identified a population of proven ephedra responders, and non-responders, comparing the two groups medically, chemically, or genetically, may provide some truly useful insights.
The report draws conclusions about efficacy and safety that are not sufficiently supported by the data.
As I have pointed out below the efficacy of ephedrine/caffeine is underestimated due to the incorrect method of analysis.
In addition, in my view a number of shortcomings in the safety assessment tend to exaggerate the adverse events.
My overall conclusion is that in several aspects the report needs some important revision.
This includes the identification of studies, selection of studies for efficacy and safety.
The data handling is also inadequate in some aspects.
Consequently the report's overall conclusions are not supported in the current version and I believe that the revision suggested below will produce a substantially changed conclusion.
Weight Loss.
In the first bullet it is stated that compounds produce weight loss over relatively short periods of time (no more than a few months).
This is misleading as there are trials for a duration of 6 months.
The same applies for the 3rd bullet where the expression "short-term weight loss" is used Bullet 6 is outrageous here it is concluded that We would ask the reviewer whether 2000 successful airplane flights mean that airplanes never crash.
The point is that 2000 studied patients is insufficient to detect a rate of 1/1000 events, and even rare events, when multiplied by the millions of people who may be consuming ephedra, add up to numerous serious adverse events, if such an association exists.
Rand Response
No response to this general comment.
Specific response made to specific comments.
We disagree that the identification of studies, selection of studies, data handling, etc. are inadequate.
We also disagree that our results underestimate the efficacy of ephedrine/ caffeine, or that our analysis is incorrect.
Six months is still "a few months" when one year data are considered necessary by FDA to assess pharmaceuticals.
The data about phentermine are taken directly from the graph in the cited reference.
We have added data about weight loss using
A3-55
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response other pharmaceuticals.
ephedrine and ephedrine plus caffeine produce a weight loss somewhat less than the effect reported for FDA approved pharmaceuticals for weight loss.
The panel has used phentermine as an example and state that the effect is "reported at about 20 pounds of weight loss at 6 months".
This is certainly not the weight loss produced by phentermine above placebo, the weight loss produced by phentermine from baseline including a diet.
For comparison one can take the Astrup et al. study from 1992 where the weight loss in the ephedrine plus caffeine arm was about 16 kg.
But of course, the weight loss in the placebo arm must be subtracted, giving an additional weight loss produced by the compound of 3.6 kg. Adverse consequences.
Again, this reviewer suggests that Our statement refers to the data included the open trials should also be included.
In the first bullet it is in our review, which was restricted to stated that it is not possible to separate out how caffeine RCTs and CCTs. contributes to the side-effects.
This is actually possible.
In the Astrup et al. in International Journal of Obesity in 1992 there was a separate caffeine arm in the 6 months trial.
Side-effects are shown in one of the tables in this paper, and here it is clear which side-effects can be attributed to caffeine.
A long-term study of comparing ephedra + caffeine with ephedrine + caffeine at promoting weight loss and adverse reactions.
Expand the pharmacokinetic study of ephedrine (pharmaceutical preparation) and ephedra (botanical preparation) absorption (as part of the dose response studies).
The most basic and important aspect of any research in natural products and in the reporting of findings is the characterization and clear definition of the products or materials being studied.
Without this, research findings cannot be reproduced and thus are meaningless.
In our case with ephedra evaluation, we not only need to set criteria for selecting articles for study, but also be sure to clearly understand what it is that we want to study ­ ephedra herb or ephedrine.
The whole field of `ephedra' in weight loss and athletic performance is twisted backwards.
The herb ephedra has never been traditionally used for either function, nor has it been first clinically reported (before ephedrine) to have these effects.
Only the drug ephedrine has.
Yet ephedra is being used for these effects and is touted as natural ephedrine and thus safer.
So far, there has been no credible clinical evidence that ephedra itself (and not synthetic ephedrine in an inert `ephedra' carrier) has these actions, despite the conclusion reached in this report.
It is worthwhile to reevaluate references 104-108 to determine whether the `ephedra' used in those studies was actually natural ephedra containing the total complements of We think this is already subsumed under the first bullet point.
The included ephedra studies said they assessed herbal ephedra.
We agree with the reviewer that a future study of ephedra should adhere to these recommendations.
A3-56
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment ephedrine alkaloids in their natural proportions.
If not, was it composed mainly of synthetic ephedrine formulated with carriers (e.g., token ephedra or exhausted ephedra marc) into an `ephedra' dietary supplement that contains little or none of the usual complements of other ephedrine alkaloids? If it is the latter, then this `ephedra' herb has no place as a dietary supplement in weight loss or athletic performance.
Such `ephedra'-containing products should then be more appropriately placed under the OTC-drug category which would eliminate much of the problems currently associated with its abuse and also would save us taxpayers much money trying to resolve these problems.
In order to show ephedra herb (not synthetic ephedrine) to also have efficacy in weight loss and/or athletic performance, it is necessary to first characterize and standardize ephedra products to specific amounts of ephedra's alkaloids in their natural proportions, before subjecting them to clinical trials.
This would eliminate the drug ephedrine being formulated into a dietary supplement to bypass the OTC-drug regulations.
Unless ephedrine-containing products (whether natural or synthetic) for weight loss and athletic performance are all considered OTC drugs, adulterated, poorly characterized, and undefined dietary supplements containing ephedra herb will continue to be sold and abused.
We need to set standards for manufacturers to meet and follow in order to be able to label and market their ephedra-containing products as dietary supplements.
As I have repeatedly stressed, the most important aspect of any research in herbal medicines/supplements is characterization and precise definition of the test materials, without which no meaningful and reproducible results can be achieved, no matter how well designed and how well executed the rest of the research.
In order to reduce the continued accumulation and dissemination of ambiguous, meaningless, and useless research data in the natural products field, we urgently need to set criteria for the characterization and precise definition of test materials at three levels: (1) research; (2) publication; and (3) abstracting, indexing, and data input into databases.
Such criteria have been published and are available.
The conclusion that "a properly designed case control study would be the appropriate next step" would require a study so large, lengthy and expensive it is unlikely to ever be funded or completed.
(If one assumes a prevalence of use of ephedra of 1%, an alpha of 0.05, a power of 80% and if one seeks to detect a doubling of risk, then 2,400 stroke cases and 2,400 unaffected controls would be required.
See Schlesselman, Case-Control Studies, Oxford University Press, 1982).
The presumed benefits of ephedrine, should they exist (improved athletic performance enhanced We agree that a properly designed case control study would need to be large (perhaps not as large as this reviewer conjectures).
However, the PPA case control study was also large and was successfully completed, and we do not favor substituting opinion for science when the scientific study is feasible.
Rand Response
A3-57
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment energy, short-term weight loss) are likely due to the sympathomimetic effects of the drug and the adverse consequences are predictable as they were with isoproterenol, amphetamines and fenfluramine.
Since sympathomimetic drugs have never been shown to result in safe and sustained weight loss, it is highly unlikely that this will be the result of long-term controlled trials of ephedrine and weight loss.
But the known adverse effects of the drug and its congeners are now well characterized.
First, you need to organize your listing of sources of adverse event information better so that readers can see which sources you have included and which you have not.
Right now, it's difficult to follow what you have gathered.
A table would be ideal, with each row specifying the source, the number of complaints, the number of deaths, serious injuries, non-serious injuries, and the numbers of each of these you concluded are likely or possibly related to ephedra use.
You do not provide clear evidence of the pharmacological and pharmacokinetic equivalences in the use of the herb or of ephedrine alone.
The complexity of the Phytochemistry of Ephedra (p 13) reinforces the point that the whole herb contains other alkaloids that are likely to be active or to qualify the effect of ephedrine.
More should be made of this deficit at various points in the text.
All of the serious adverse events came from FDA data, so in the draft report such a table would have no meaning.
In the revised report, such a table is included.
Rand Response
We agree that there is likely heterogeneity in the herbal concoctions, but note the striking consistency of our findings relative to amount of ephedrine alkaloid and weight loss.
There is insufficient evidence that dietary supplements We disagree and believe the data speak made up of the herb Ephedra spp. have any of the effects or for themselves.
risks identified for the alkaloid ephedrine.
The future research directions proposed are reasonable.
This was added to the future research.
One addition may be to recommend examining the interaction of ephedrine and exercise training on weight loss and adverse events.
Is there some interaction between physical activity and ephedrine? If the majority of ephedra users are seeking long-term weight loss, it would be very helpful to better understand the age, gender, race, temporal use patterns, concomitant drug use and other risk factors associated with ephedra usage.
These points are underdeveloped and are, I believe, central to understanding safe and appropriate use of ephedra in the general population.
I agree with the suggestion to analyze and compare the adverse events reported for ephedrine to ephedra.
I would also add PPA.
We agree in principle with this comment, but think it might wait until there is better evidence of sustained weight loss in any population.
This report now includes an assessment of ephedrine so this bullet has been eliminated.
The suggestion to consider a dose response study to While it may be difficult, it is certainly determine a minimum effective dose of ephedra would be feasible and consistent with the way FDA difficult, at best.
Effectiveness criteria should be identified in evaluates pharmaceuticals for weight loss.
these comments.
A3-58
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Rand Response There remain open questions whether there is a difference Agreed. between synthetic ephedrine and naturally extracted ephedrine alkaloids.
It would be a very useful research activity to analyze the branded products which are identified in AER's using both AOAC and USP methods to try and determine whether synthetic or naturally occurring ephedrine alkaloids are present.
Future Research.
The "numerous gaps" in the literature regarding the efficacy and safety of ephedra is a central point.
No response
FDA has recently taken action against six companies selling No response synthetic ephedrine as dietary supplements.
This is not permitted under current law but, unfortunately, synthetic ephedrine dietary supplements are being sold to the general public.
As a final thought, the inadequacy of FDA's adverse event This is not a proper role for an EPC reporting system is clear as it relates to ephedrine.
I believe evidence report and we decline to make it is appropriate for RAND to recommend that, with respect such recommendations.
to ephedra products, FDA/CFSAN's process and systems to evaluate and capture ephedra-related AER's be thoroughly reviewed, as it is likely that continued reliance will be placed on this system, despite its weaknesses.
A chapter was devoted to future research.
The researchers No response addressed the gaps in a variety of areas and suggested meaningful recommendations for further research.
Most significant is the need for long-term studies of ephedra/ephedrine and weight loss and athletic performance including both anaerobic and aerobic exercise.
This was emphasized in this chapter.
It might be beneficial to explain the pathophysiology of how ephedra/ ephedrine can contribute to an acute cardiovascular event in the setting of mild-moderate underlying disease.
For instance, in individuals with noncritical coronary artery disease, ephedrine alkaloids can produce platelet aggregation with resultant thrombus, increased myocardial oxygen demand, and cause vasospasm, all of which can result in decreased perfusion and ischemia.
The same contributory actions could be expected in individuals with congenital cerebral aneurysms, and other underlying abnormalities in the cardiovascular system.
While we agree that biologic rationale is an important criterion when assessing causality, we think that direct evidence of an association is most important, and therefore recommend a hypothesis-testing study.
The implications for future research are fairly stated.
I would This was added to the Future Research suggest adding the analysis of safety or adverse events Section.
reports in Denmark comparing available prescription obesity drugs, since Denmark uses caffeine and ephedrine as one of it's approved prescription drugs for obesity.
Are implications for research discussed? Not adequately.
The major implication of the research is whether the The role of the EPC is to report the evidence which we believe we have done
A3-59
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment analysis will be adequate to advise the FDA and HHS on whether they should take action to protect the public.
This aspect of the analysis is ignored.
What directions for future research would you recommend based on this report that we have not covered? As I discuss in the following general statement, the missing ingredient in this (in addition to the issue of how the products are being used by the public) is the need for an analysis of the complete pharmacology of ephedrine/caffeine products.
This must include consideration of the modern science of pharacogenomics and genetic polymorphisms of receptors for these products.
This type of analysis adds relevance and credibility to adverse events that occur in low frequencies.
It explains how some patients can have little or no change in blood pressure or heart rate and how some can be placed at risk of stroke, seizures or heart attacks.
Implications for future research were discussed.
Physicians and most pharmacologists seem to want to lay the blame for problems associated with ephedra supplements at the feet of ephedrine/ caffeine.
This narrow view excludes the pharmacological activity or potential interactions with other phytochemicals present in these products.
In the opinion of this reviewer, the problem is more complex than simply ephedrine and caffeine.
Regarding future research aimed at stroke aspects, it would seem valuable to pursue case-control studies along the lines of that by Kernan and colleagues cited above but considering both hemorrhagic and idiopathic ischemic stroke in relatively young adults.
Rand Response The judgment about the adequacy of the evidence to make a judgment is not a role for the EPC.
A good suggestion, but one that we feel is probably some years off, as opposed to the three studies listed first.
A genetic analysis could conceivably be added to a case control study and used as an effect modifier in the analysis.
This is a good point.
An assessment of ephedra use may be able to take advantage of the heterogeneity in concoctions to perform subgroup analyses looking for ingredients other than ephedrine and caffeine.
Agreed.
The proposed case control study should assess all of the serious outcomes we assessed.
Page 5, paragraphs 3 and 4 would it be appropriate to We do not think so.
The exposure has mention ethical considerations for case-controlled studies in already occurred.
the summary? Page 5, paragraph 4: "Pre-clinical studies should also be considered to determine the use of ephedrine or ephedrine containing the alkaloids increases the risk of development of heat related conditions such as heat exhaustion, heat stroke, and rhabdmyolysis, if an appropriate animal model can be found."
What specifically would be learned from this? Could it be extrapolated to humans? Rewrite to redirect emphasis of sentence by placing, "If an appropriate animal model can be found, pre-clinical studies should be....and rhabdomyolysis."
I would suggest come additions to the section of future research including an interaction study to investigate the effects of ephedra with not just caffeine-containing herbs, but also combined with botanicals such as citrus aurantium, garcinia cambogia and the herbal diuretics and cathartics It might help establish a biologic rationale, but in this discussion we have deleted the "animal model" and "pre-clinical aspect" to this and suggest it be included in a study of adverse outcomes in humans.
We actually eliminated the "preclinical studies" part of this and suggest a study assessing this as a potential adverse event.
These suggestions have been added.
A3-60
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment as listed in Table 1.
Also, I would specifically suggest that studies on athletic performance be conducted in women and adolescents, since these populations are known users of these products.
Finally, I would recommend that the association between ephedra and seizures be formally explored.
Future Research Section.
You favor a case-control study.
The case-control trial with phenylpropanolamine was sufficient to remove the drug from the market, but it was a pretty poor study.
The controls and cases had very different lifestyle habits.
There was a no-dose-response to PPA.
The effect was only detected in women.
Because of the large number of things used in the many products on the market, and the relatively high rate of deaths and disability from heart disease and stroke, it is not clear that a useful answer would emerge.
Another point that available data it is populations are at and that this could research.
might be useful to make is that from the not possible to determine which greatest risk for serious adverse events, only be determined by additional We disagree.
We think such a study would tell us something useful about ephedra products.
We do not think the heterogeneity in the components of the products will be any greater impediment to the analysis of safety than it was to efficacy.
Our data are consistent with the hypothesis that the only active components with respect to efficacy and safety are ephedrine and caffeine.
This point has been made in our suggestion for a hypothesis testing study.
Rand Response
A3-61
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) CAUSALITY COMMENTS The remaining reviewer comments from the first review concern an attempt in our draft document to assess causality for some adverse events.
We did so using our own modification of published methods.
These comments varied widely, ranging from critiques of our method for being too conservative (meaning, in the opinion of some reviewers, we had excluded or assigned too low a level of causality to certain cases) to critiques for being too liberal (meaning, in the opinion of some reviewers, we assigned too high a level of causality to certain cases).
Often, these conflicting comments concerned the same cases.
We believe these peer review comments demonstrate that case report reviews involve considerably more subjective interpretation than do reviews of randomized trials.
Because our goal in this evidence report is to report the evidence as objectively as possible, we ceased to assign assessments of causality to the case reports.
Rather, we tried to identify those cases that would be classified medically as "idiopathic" in etiology, meaning the cause is not known.
For such cases, given the known pharmacology of ephedrine, if use of ephedra or ephedrine was documented, a potential role for ephedra or ephedrine in causing the event must be considered.
We classified such cases as "sentinel events."
Other than correct typographical errors and respond to questions of fact, we do not provide a response to the numerous criticisms of the causality algorithm or suggestions to change our interpretation of these case reports based on the reviewer's opinion or "additional information" they posses that we did not have in the documents available to us to review.
Reviewer Comment Although the present study was compared to that report by Haller and Benowitz (New England J Med), why was a comparison not made to the Samenuk et al. study (Mayo Clin.
Proc.)? Were individual case numbers not available from Dr. Samenuk? On page 51, in Level 2 of the Causal Flow Model, what is meant by "in more than minimal dose"? What constitutes a minimal dose? Are you talking about ephedrine, ephedrine/caffeine, or ephedra supplements? It must be emphasized that ephedrine and caffeine in conjunction potentially hundreds of other pharmalogically active phytochemicals constitute an ephedra supplement? Accordingly, the pharmacodynamic effects for ephedra supplements are not directly comparable to synthetic ephedrine or ephedrine/caffeine combinations.
Furthermore, given the heterogeneity of ephedra supplement formulations, the pharmacodynamic effects of individual ephedra supplements are expected to vary.
It should also be acknowledged in the final report that there is very little consistency in the results of any expert attempts at assessing causality with this same set of AERs.
The draft touched on this issue in discussing comparison with other reports and in presenting information in Table 22.
The language of the draft is not, however, consistent with the data in the table.
The draft states that the current judgments "are more conservative than those of Drs. Haller and Benowitz" but that there was agreement that some cases cannot otherwise be explained.
It is difficult to understand how such statements, with their implication that any differences are either minimal it immaterial, can possibly be associated with the actual information in the table.
The table identifies 24 cases 20 of which were evaluated by both this Rand Response
A3-62
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment group and by Haller and Benowitz.
In only 5 of these is there full agreement.
Twelve of the 20 cases are cases where Haller and Benowitz report possible or probable causality while the current reviewers reported insufficient information! It is curious that the Table does not note that, of the 11 cases reported by the draft as probably and the 26 cases identified as possibly related to the use of ephedra, Haller and Benowitz only classified 2 of the first and 7 of the second as either probably or possibly related.
Information is not provided to assist in understanding whether Haller and Benowitz had classed these as not associated with ephedra of whether they had not evaluated these cases.
If the first case, it should be disclosed if the second, there should be some mention that the current causality assessment is preliminary and subject to review by other qualified experts.
It is also curious why reviews with different conclusions by other parties were not acknowledged.
For example, in at least one case where both this group and Haller and Benowitz agreed that there was a possible causal relation between use of ephedra and death, the local coroner ascribed the unfortunate incident to congenital problem.
In addition testimony was given by Theodore Farber, Ph.D. on August 8, 2000 at the HHS Office of Women's Health to discuss the issue of inconsistency at length and in detail.
As Dr, Farber noted " There was a sufficient lack of concordance between the FDA's causality analysis and the causality analysis performed by it outside experts."
Other presenters at this meeting provided analyses of these AERs that found quite different conclusion that have been drawn in the Draft.
It must be assumed that the record of this meeting and possibly more specific information, was accessible as the draft was being prepared but it does not appear that any attention was paid to any other commentary on causality reviews to date.
This must be corrected.
In discussing the case reports the Draft states that "events related to synthetic ephedrine" were removed.
Notwithstanding out earlier attempt to clarify that synthetic ephedrine probably means ephedrine in isolation (or its salts, e.g. ephedrine hydrochloride), at least 8 of the cases reported on were associated with a product that was labeled to contain ephedrine hydrochloride (the E'OLA product) or was subsequently found, or at least has come out to be assumed to have been manufactured with undisclosed ephedrine salts (Formula One).
At lease two cases do not identify the brand so it is not known how this determination was made from these cases.
Almost every `Probable" case and "Possible" case had either a preexisting condition that could have contributed to the adverse event or exhibited unhealthy behaviors Rand Response
A3-63
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment (excessive drinking, smoking, "intense effort to lose weight") which should be noted.
On p 69 and Table 22 there is a comparison of the results of Rand evaluation of FDA AER with those of Dr. Benowitz ­ the specific criteria to meet definite, probably or possible causality are explicitly stated for the Benowitz evaluation [as was the case with other expert evaluations of these data in the FDA docket].
It would be useful to specifically list the criteria used for the Rand Evaluation for their classification.
It is stated that the Rand evaluation is more conservative than the analysis by Benowitz, but what about comparisons with other expert reviews of these data [2 FDA reviews, Woosley, Benowitz, Ricaurte and Stoll]? Table 22 Summary of comparision with other reports of ephedra adverse events there is an error in the table for FDA case number 12720 and 12722.
According to information elsewhere in the report, the following appear to be the correct data entries: Case# Adverse event Benowitz EPC 12720 Death Possible Insufficient information 12722 Death Possible Possible What was the classification of the CanTox study commissioned by CRN? Do you have information as to how soon an autopsy was performed? Could this have any impact on the toxicological screen results? I would assume that the prevalence of pre-existing coronary artery disease is very high.
Therefore, when interpretations are made as to causality and risk for most Americans, it may be important to have some reference numbers as to how many Americans have pre-existing CAD.According to the Am Heart Association (using NHANES III data), 1 in 5 males and females has come form of cardiovascular disease, see this website for details about CAD.See American Heart Association.
2002 Heart and Stroke Statistical Update.
Dallas, Texas: American Heart Association, 2001.http://www.americanheart.org/downloadable/heart/101 48328094661013190990123HS_State_02.pdf My prior bias about ephedra and stroke was based on influential case-control study of the relationship between the use of phenylpropanolamine, a compound with related physiological effects, and hemorrhagic stroke (Kernan WN et al.
NEJM 2000;343:1826-32).
I believe that it is likely, reenforced by the data in this draft report, that ephedra use occasionally leads to stroke.
However, for the purpose of this review, I have elected to play the devils advocate in considering the specific question: "how strong is the existing A neurologist was included in the review process in this revision.
"Grand mal" seizure was the description of the event in the original source material.
Rand Response
A3-64
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment evidence that use of ephedra can cause a stroke?" Because determining the cause of strokes among young people is not that often straightforward, it would have been optimal to have the stroke cases reviewed and classified by a stroke expert with experience in evaluation of young stroke.
The case reports (p.63) suggest a lack of neurological sophistication (i.e. grand mal seizure in case 11062 is not technically correct; generalized convulsive seizure is probably what was intended).
OK,so this is an irrelevant elitist comment, but in the absence of hard evidence, credibility is a subjective issue.
Case 10874 is categorized as "probably causal" : along time intravenous drug abuser with phenylpropanolamine on toxicology screen.
Case 9335 is classified as "possibly causal": 56 year old woman with hypertension, tabacco use, elevated cholesterol and triglicerides, an MRI with microvascular changes and whose event was lacunar infarct.
Case 12713 was "possibly causal": a 63 year-old woman with artificial fibrillation with acute loss of conscious and embolic stroke.
It would be easy to take issue with classification of likelihood of causality in each case.
In short, I agree with the appropriately cautious conclusion that "there is sufficient evidence to suggst a possible causal role of ephedra-containing dietary supplements in rare, but serious adverse events, particularily cerebral hemorrhage."
(p.vi) Support for this statement would be better served by have a stroke expert review the case reports and perhaps tossing our the marginal cases (such as noted above).
Further, since this authoratative report may eventually be used for medical-legal purposes, it would seem responsible to include a caveat that it is not sensible to consider all strokes of idiopathic cause in people taking ephedra as caused by the agent.
These comments are not meant to disparage the overall quality of this impressive report.
As noted at the outset, I have elected to play the devil's advocate concerning this specific aspect.
The criteria for determining causality were arbitrary and did not address the true causality.
In fact, the term "causality" is misleading in this connection.
Rather, the term "association" should be used as in "guilt by association".
Lay people will read this report and "probable causality" will be interpreted as a cause-effect relationship which is not warranted by the data available from medical record reviews.
The limitations of the data collection are not emphasized enough in this report.
Adverse reactions reports by definition have no denominator and are subject to reporting bias.
In the famous Phen-Fen debate, initial reports on which the FDA took action suggested at 35% incidence of valvular abnormalities.
Subsequently, this was found to be less than 8% and reversible following discontinuation of the Rand Response
A3-65
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment medications.
It is very important to the integrity of this report that the basic questions asked in the contract are answered, that the report is well ordered, and that only scientifically valid information is included.
If the AER information, which is not scientifically valid is included, it should be included as an appendix, not in the body of the report, as this takes away from the science.
Use of the terms probably and possibly causally related may make the causality assessment sound more objective than it is.
Would be the subjective natures of the assessment be more effectively conveyed by changing those AERs currently designated as probably causal to possibly causal, such as events if uncertain relationship? Instead of specific designations it might be adequate to describe the results in narrative form.
The narrative could explain that although in some cases cofounders make it difficult to attribute causality, there is a subset of cases in which cofounders make it difficult to attribute causality, there is a subset of cases on which cofounding factors are minimal or absent as far as can be determined, and it is these cases that raise concern over safety.
Whatever terms or phrases are used, defining them early in the document will help even those unfamiliar with adverse event causality analyses understand their meaning.
Should make it clear that it is not possible to determine the actual level of risk for people taking ephedra or ephedrine because the number of people who actually take it is not known.
It would be helpful to provide possible reasons for the differences between the RAND causality assessment and the one done by Haller and Benowitz, this could be done by adding text to point out that: I.
Each group used different criteria.
II.
The same group of experts would come to different conclusions of they were using different sets of criteria for evaluating the same set of AERs, and III.
The RAND report use more stringent/restrictive criteria for assigning causality than were used in the Haller and Benowitz review, resulting in more conservative assessment.
Requirement of angiography for assigning causality for M.I.s to Ephedra (similar comments from two reviewers): Page V Paragraph 5:" for cases of myocardial infarction, we required coronary angiography to have been performed and the results available."
This seems like a very restrictive set of myocardial infarction cases.
What would be the effect on the results if angiography had not yet been done? Why was this restriction used? Results section explains this better, Assume all such cases would have been classified as This table has been dropped from this revision since causality is no longer assessed.
Rand Response
A3-66
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment possibly causal , so the data is still listed.
Pages 3 and 32: While we understand the importance if documenting the occurrence of myocardial infarction by restricting the documentation of the event so that the cardiac characterization is required to assign causality to ephedra, are the number of MI events being underestimated? Why not also use enzyme changes in laboratory specimens and Q-wave changes on the EKG to assign causality? "`Probably not causal' was used for events that had clear other causes discovered on detailed investigation."
This assumes all events had a single cause.
But can't someone with known atherosclerosis die suddenly because of superimposed effects of a substance.
This sentence is confusing " In the 935 reports, there were data in 968 subjects of which 925 reported taking ephedra."
Not clear how there can be more subjects than reports.
A case presented (#12843, 15-year-old female) without any reference to ephedra exposure.
Absent that information, it would be hard to make this even a possibly causal classification.
A couple of reviewers were confused by the mention of We added text to try and help explain this.
AERs that took place after September 30, 2001.
Perhaps a footnote on the table would be informative to remind readers if the timeframe for the AERs analyzed.
Table 20 provides a lot of useful information, but it might be easier for readers to interpret the data if another table were added.
This table would have 5 columns across the top, labeled Product, #Probably Causal, #Possible Causal, # Insufficient Information, and Total (terminology may change based on other comments).
Data from the case report of the death of a 28-year-old female indicates that the MiniThin was one of the products that she was taking.
MiniThins were shown to contain synthetic ephedrine, not ephedra, and the FDA required the company stop marketing it for weight loss and change the name and marketing focus (product name was subsequently changed to MiniTwoWays and was marketed for use on people with bronchial asthma).
Should this AER be included there? Specific cases.
Page 60, Deaths, Probably Causal: A 21year-old male collapsed...": This patient has been taking hydroxycut, which I assume is hydroxy citrate.
Hydroxy citrate is probably quite toxic, though it has not been systematically assessed in clinical trials.
Biochemically it may be assumed to have a substantially liver toxic effect.
I think it is therefore very difficult to attribute the case to ephedrine.
I think that there are too many examples of patients with many other risk factors such as those included We considered but did not make any changes to this table.
A different kind of Summary Table is included with this revision.
A single FDA MedWatch report can contain information on more than one person.
Rand Response
This case was included in the ephedra FDA MedWatch file.
The patient was also taking Yellow Jacket.
A3-67
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment under the "probably causal" myocardial infarctions, e.g. a 54-year-old, who has smoked for 30 years and been an alcoholic.
Specific cases.
Page 62, Deaths, Probably Causal (cont'd): Page 62: Another example is the "Stroke, Probably Causal": "She was a long-time intravenous drug abuser and alcohol abuser.
She also smoked cigarettes for 10 years."
She tested positive for benzodiazapines and phenylpropanolamine, whereas there was no positive test for ephedrine.
I strongly disagree with the conclusion that this case can be classified as probably causal with respect to ephedra use.
It is more likely, with the given history and the positive test of the patient, that the stroke was caused by other vaso-active drugs taken by the patient.
These weaknesses apply to several of the other stroke cases, and I think this is particularly interesting in light of the metaanalysis of adverse events reported from control trials (Table 17, page 80) where it is found that there is no statistically significant increased risk of hypertension.
This also quite clear from the control study by Ingerslev et al. on hypertensive patients treated with ephedrine/caffeine.
One should therefore be cautious about drawing conclusions on the causality with respect to stroke.
HHS and GAO Statements Regarding the Same AERs that RAND Reviewed.
The draft report attempts to ascribe degrees of causality to the ephedra AERs, thereby ignoring recent statements by the Department of Health and Human Services and the General Accounting Office ("GAO").
HHS and FDA recently reviewed the same AERs that RAND reviewed, and issued a response to Public Citizen on June 14 that provides the following: The primary purpose of a voluntary adverse event reporting system is to generate 'signals' of potentially related events, rather than assessing product safety.
While a 'signal' has been generated by these reports, FDA has determined that questions remain on the likelihood and strength of association between ephedrine alkaloids and the adverse events reported to the FDA...
There are situations when background rates of the observed event are so rare or unusual that, in combination with physiologic responses and biologic plausibility, a significant relationship between the events is self-evident from the reports in a voluntary reporting system.
However, the FDA has advised me that the types of observed outcomes reported in relationship to the ingestion of ephedrine alkaloids are not uncommon in the general population and therefore the reports alone do not provide a scientific basis for assessing the safety of ephedrine alkaloids or establish a link between the reported adverse events and the ingestion of ephedrine alkaloids. (emphasis added).
The draft report should mention and cite the aboveRand Response
A3-68
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment mentioned letter and FDA's and HAS' position with regard to the AERs and attempts to ascribe causality.
The draft report also does not acknowledge the GAO report on ephedra AERs, which reviewed the same AERs and determined that they were "poorly documented," further weakening RAND's reliance upon reports for causation analysis.
GAO also noted that the AERs have "inherent weaknesses" and lacked or had inconsistent information...such as the amount of the product used, how often it was used, or for how long it was used.
These limitations were not prominently identified in the RAND report - nor were the general limitations associated with attempts to ascribe causality based upon review of information obtained from a passive surveillance system.
GAO also noted that, based upon its review of specific AERs, it was not possible to draw conclusions regarding the "causal relationship between ingestion of the implicated product and the adverse event observed."
Potential Product Variation.
As noted above, the draft report does not even acknowledge the possibility that certain ephedra supplements may not be standardized and/or manufactured according to GMPs.
Accordingly, even assuming causation (which is a major assumption), it is conceivable that certain adverse events may have been caused by problems with a specific product (such as having more ephedrine alkaloids or caffeine than stated on the label).
Although it is my understanding that most manufacturers of ephedra employ stringent quality controls, this is still nevertheless a significant possibility that should be reflected in the report.
Attachment B contains an article prepared by Dr. Gurley entitled "Content versus label claims in ephedra-containing dietary supplements."
Although this article reviewed only a small subset of ephedra products, and only reviewed a small sample-size of bottles, it nevertheless supports the conclusion that it may be inappropriate to assume that all ephedra products are identical with regard to product quality.
Accordingly, even assuming causation, it should be noted that there is no assurance that any potential adverse health events were not caused as a result of consumers ingesting non-standardized products that contain too much ephedrine or caffeine.
It would be inappropriate for RAND to assume that consumption of ephedrine and caffeine within labeled amounts is a potential problem if the possibility exists that certain incidents may have been caused by consuming nonstandardized products.
Accordingly, my strong opinion is that as part of its review, RAND should call for FDA to finalize dietary supplement GMPs and impose stringent quality control requirements on ephedra manufacturers to ensure that such products contain what they are claimed to contain.
Haller/Benowitz Review of AERs The draft report places Rand Response
A3-69
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment great importance of the review of ephedra adverse events reports conducted by Dr. Haller and Benowitz.
In fact, the draft report compares RAND's assessment of AERs with the Haller/Benowitz assessment.
The draft report, however, fails to mention that Drs. Haller and Benowitz subsequently wrote a letter to the editor of the New England Journal of Medicine (Attachment C) indicating that their review did NOT prove causation or provide quantitative information with regard to risk.
Specifically, their letter provides the following: Finally, our report describes a series of cases in which the use of ephedrine-containing dietary supplements was associated with a diverse cardiovascular events.
Our report does not prove causation, nor does it provide quantitative information with regard to risk.
A large-scale case-control study similar to the Hemorrhagic Stroke Project for phenylpropanolamine is needed to determine the risks associated with these dietary supplements.
Based upon this letter and clarification, it is unclear why the Haller/Benowitz review of the AERs is used as a baseline for purposes of comparison.
Moreover, it is unclear why their statement regarding causation and the recommendation of a case-control study is not highlighted as this would appear to be information that RAND should consider as a recommendation for further research.
Importance of Background Risk - Kimmel Study.
This draft report fails to cite favorable analyses of FDA AERs including a detailed study conducted by Dr. Steven Kimmel that was presented before the Office of Women's Health (Attachment D).
Dr. Kimmel reviewed the AERs and determined that the number of events was consistent with background rates in the general population.
His report highlights the importance of background risk - an issue that should be highlighted in the RAND report.
He concludes that the AERs - even assuming significant under-reporting are not suggestive of causation.
In this regard, he quoted FDA" "it is possible that the reported serious adverse events are reflective of coincidental background spontaneous occurrences in the population and are not necessarily causally related..."
OTC Drugs Containing Ephedrine and Caffeine.
The draft report does not prominently refer to the wide usage in the United States of ephedrine in OTC drug products.
The report should include use-data for OTC drugs, and should explain that FDA has already determined - under the OTC Drug Review - that ephedrine is safe and effective (as a bronchodilator) in does well over 100 mg per day (the maximum dose level for the vast majority of ephedra supplements on the market).
In addition, the FDA does not require such products to contraindicate caffeine ingestion (i.e. consumers routinely ingest such products along with coffee tea and other beverages that contain caffeine) This Rand Response
A3-70
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment information must be factored into the final report, as they have a direct bearing on any safety assessment of ephedrine and caffeine.
OTC drug use-data indicates that the combination of ephedrine and caffeine is safe.
Scientific Data and the Landmark Six-Month HarvardColumbia Trial.
The draft report acknowledges that "there were no serious adverse events reported in these clinical trials."
Despite this, the report barely addresses this issue.
Rather, the vast majority of the report reviews and subjectively interprets AERs that GAO, HHS, and FDA have already reviewed.
Even though the number of subjects in the clinical studies is limited, and therefore it is conceivable that small subsets of the population may have some susceptibility, the clinical data is far more reliable than the anecdotal adverse event reports and should receive greater prominence than the AERs.
In addition, the report does not place enough significance upon scientific data such as the Cantox Report and the landmark six-month HarvardColumbia trial (published in the International Journal of Obesity).
The Harvard-Columbia trial addresses the review of adverse event reports, and makes suggestions regarding future research.
The RAND report should contain a more detailed discussion of this landmark trial - including the researchers assessments regarding product safety and efficacy.
For ease of review, sections of the report addressing adverse event reports, product safety and efficacy, and future research are included below: In a FDA-sponsored analysis, Haller and Benowitz categorized 140 adverse-event reports based on how likely they believed the reported events to have resulted from the use of ephedra supplements.
The difficulty in making such judgments is illustrated by the controversy regarding their conclusions.
With millions of American consuming ephedra-containing products it is obvious that some number of adverse events is expected each year regardless of consumption of these products.
The real question is not whether adverse events occur in a population undergoing treatment, but whether these occur at a rate that is higher than that of a matched, untreated group.
This is impossible to determine from adverse event reports alone.
The randomized, placebocontrolled trial allows evaluation of cause and effect relationships vs. coincidental events.
Most clinical trials purposely exclude individuals with pre-existing medical conditions to avoid confounding of results.
It is therefore not justified to extrapolate results from such trials to individuals with such exclusionary medical conditions or to extrapolate results beyond amounts or time periods that have been studied.
The possibility of unfavorable interactions between herbal combinations and other medications either prescription or Rand Response
A3-71
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment illicit, should be recognized and warning labels present on herbal products should be adhered to.
Some have expressed the theory that adverse event reports may reflect an unusually high degree of sensitivity in a small fraction of individuals.
Because of the low suspected incidence, this type of sensitivity might not be revealed in a clinical trial, but requires a case-control study of a very large number of individuals.
Such a study would be difficult to conduct, but may be the only way to address the question of rare hypersensitivity.
In total, these [ephedra studies] suggest that herbal ephedra/caffeine herbal supplements, when used as directed by healthy overweight men and women in combination with healthy diet and exercise habits, may be beneficial for weight reduction without significantly increased risk of adverse events.
In total, these [ephedra studies] suggest that herbal ephedra/caffeine herbal supplements, when used as directed by healthy overweight men and women in combination with healthy diet and exercise habits, may be beneficial for weight reduction without significantly increased risk of adverse events.
The current widespread usage of herbal products and the increasing incidence of obesity warrant additional clinical trials to confirm and extend these results.
(emphasis added).
Finally, it should be noted that the Harvard-Columbia Trial researchers, and Drs. Haller and Benowitz appear to agree that in order to evaluate the safety of ephedra, a long-term control study would be beneficial.
The draft report in the end recognizes the futility of trying to reach scientific conclusions from the AER's, recommending that a case control study be done to assess risk and recommending against further AER analysis.
Nevertheless, a detailed causality assessment was performed and included in the draft report, and conclusions of this assessment are presented without context.
Further, the draft report describes the involvement of the TEP in a way makes it appear this assessment was done on the recommendation of the TEP., when I and others thought that there was a general agreement within the TEP and RAND further assessing causality based on the AER's was not recommended and would not be part of the ephedra review.
The draft report on page 21 states that the "Highest level if causality that could be ascribed.
Was "probably" causal".
This is not a position taken by the TEP at the November meeting; in fact it is contradictory to the TEP's position as quoted above.
There was a discussion of the characteristics of the case reports, but not in the context as stated on Page 21..."that would be necessary in order to assign a classification of "probably causal."
The criteria quoted were of causality The report not only implies (also The causality analysis was dropped from this revision.
Regarding the involvement of the TEP, there was a lengthy discussion of the criteria by which we would assess case reports, so we are surprised this TEP member concluded "the TEP" agreed that such a review was not warranted.
We did not receive any such comment from any other TEP member, all of whom reviewed this report.
Rand Response
A3-72
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment on page 31) but also states that the TEP agreed with this causality classification categorization, which was not the case.
The classification scheme was developed after the November meeting, and any category such as "possible causal" or "probably causal" that suggests a causal relationship is in contrast to the position of the TEP at the November meeting.
Terminology of "possibly" or "probably" causal is too strong and more than suggestive of causality, and to suggest that these terms are less than "definitely" causal is too fine a point for readers of this report and also an incorrect representation of the TEP's position.
If the causality assessment remains in the final report, I suggest that all reference to this classification scheme be changed accordingly, to omit the word "causal".
The conclusions could be characterized as weak evidence or possibly suggestive evidence, but the words causality and causal are too strong.
The draft report notes correctly about the AERs that "The most important limitation is that the study design, that is an assessment of case reports, is insufficient to warrant definite conclusions regarding causality."
Yet when it came to assessment of individual case reports, there were definite conclusions that the AERs prove ephedra to be unsafe.
The result is a misleading presentation of the available information.
For the reasons explained above, I feel the report requires major revision and subsequent further review by the TEP.
Because I have been focused on the fundamentals of the reports as described above, I haven't even considered the comments on details that are included in the draft report.
The weakness of the FDA AER database must be better addressed, and the causality analysis should either be removed from the report or substantial revised to, among other things, provide the necessary context and to change the classification of the AERs to avoid using the terms "causal" and "causality".
The fact that the safety section is dominated buy the AER analysis reduces the credibility of the section and indeed the whole part of the report.
However, in the opinion of the reviewer, those conclusions regarding the case reports are limited by a combination of the conservative causality assessment criteria and the limited medical records and toxicology data available for most case reports.
For example, hypertension was defined as a systolic pressure in excess of 180 and a diastolic pressure in excess of 105.
Also, no consideration appeared to have been given to the contribution multi-component ephedra-containing dietary supplements might have had in those individuals with underlying cardiovascular or cerebrovascular disease.
I think it is generally accepted among the medical and scientific community the presence Rand Response
A3-73
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment of sympathomimetic likelihood of adverse think most clinicians differential diagnosis agents could potentially exacerbate the events in such populations? I would would factor such information into their rather than dismiss them altogether.
Rand Response
Adverse Events Reports: One limitation with your approach taken in evaluation of the adverse events reports made to the FDA is that your causality algorithm does not include an assessment of whether ephedra played a contributory role on the adverse event.
Because ephedra is available as a dietary supplement, it is likely that many persons taking these products are not using them under doctor's supervision, and may have medical contraindications to their use.
Therefore, the role of underlying disease becomes a crucial factor in causation assessment, particularly when a potential risk factor often goes undetected (i.e. essential hypertension, structural heart defect), or when a condition is omitted from the ephedra product label warning (i.e. family history of premature CAD, sickle cell trait).
Two AERs that you assess as no higher than possibly causal illustrate this point.
AER 12485 did indeed have a moderate degree of coronary artery disease detected at autopsy.
However, he was reportedly in good health without history of angina, and had been jogging regularly without adverse effects.
Because he collapsed suddenly after returning from jogging, we felt this was a primary arrhythmic event due to ephedra.
Similarly AER 12843 was a healthy, adolescent who had participated in competitive sports for many years.
She had appeared to have been wellcompensated for a serious underlying coronary artery abnormality that was clinically undetected since birth.
Only with use of Ripped Fuel, did she suffer a catastrophic cardiac event resulting in death.
We felt that the cardiac stimulant effects of ephedra resulted in myocardial ischemia in this case.
It would be helpful to specify what degree of pre-existing This case was reviewed by a cardiologist coronary artery disease would constitute a significant risk who made this judgment.
factor to result in myocardial infarction or sudden death in the absence of stimulant use, thereby ruling out ephedra in the causation assessment.
(page 32 of chapter 2 methodology).
In the case of AER 14530 (page 63), I would disagree that 20-30% stenosis would be significant enough to result in acute M.I. in a 43-year-old female smoker without a significant contributory effect from the ephedra alkaloids in Metabolife.
On page 59 I suggest the authors be slightly cautious with We have revised this language.
their use of language such as "probably causal" and "no other possible explanation."
The latter phrase is particularly troubling.
What they mean is no other explanation that they could identify.
Similarly, on page 69 they state that there are a certain number of cases of serious adverse events that
A3-74
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment "cannot be explained by causes other than ephedra use."
While I do not deny that it is extremely likely that many cases of adverse events happen due to ephedra use, simply because we do not have in our hand an explanation of why an event occurred other than a particular explanation under consideration, does not mean that the particular explanation under consideration is the correct one.
Because of the paucity of large randomized trials, evidence concerning stroke and ephedra by necessity consists of analysis of case reports.
"...An assessment of case reports is insufficient to warrant definite conclusions regarding causality." (p.110) Nevertheless, arbitrary criteria are used to define "probably cause": documentation that a stroke occurred, that ephedra was used, and that there was exclusion of other potential causes.
The definition may be too liberal.
Of ischemic strokes in relatively young adults (i.e. those 
The definition implies that all idiopathic strokes would be classified as "probably causal" if ephedra was used in any dose in proximity to the event.
Given the frequency of idiopathic stroke, many (perhaps most) neurologists would consider "possibly causal" to be a better designation in this situation.
Are there specific clinical circumstances in which the relationship of ephedra use and idiopathic stroke could be certain? Perhaps if acute, striking elevation of blood pressure were known to precede the stroke onset of of angiographic features characteristic of vasospasm were present in the abscence of migrane? Arbitrary to be sure, and not very helpful.
The evidence for effectiveness supports the conclusion.
Except for AERs, however, little evidence of toxicity is actually provided, and evidence of safety has been largely ignored.
No evidence is provided to even suggest "a possible causal role of ephedrine-containing dietary supplement in rare, but serious events," let alone extremely common events such as heart attack and stroke.
Even critics of ephedra have concluded that the clinical effects of pharmaceutical ephedrine, and the ephedrine contained in herbal preparations, are indistinguishable.
Gurley states that the increased incidence of ma huang toxicity does not stem from differences in the absorption of botanical ephedrine compared with synthetic ephedrine."
Haller and Benowitz, in their most recent publication, conclude, "Botanical stimulants have disposition characteristics similar to their pharmaceutical counterparts..."
The Cantox Report, and the Report of the Expert Panel of the EEC reached similar conclusions.
Since there are no real differences, studies demonstrating the safety of pharmaceutical ephedrine and pharmaceutical ephedrine in combination with pharmaceutical caffeine should not be Rand Response
A3-75
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment excluded when considering the safety of herbal equivalents.
The explanation most frequently offered for alleged cases of ephedrine-related stroke is drug-induced blood pressure elevation, this in spite of the fact that no clinical trial, of any duration, has ever demonstrated that a clinically significant effect on blood pressure exists.
Indeed, the studies that have addressed this question.
including the most recent paper by Drs Haller and Benowitz, have shown diminishing cardiovascular effects over time.
In other words, if dangerous blood pressure elevations do not occur with the first dose ephedrine, they are even less likely to occur with prolonged dosing.
These studies should be included in the RAND review of ephedra and should be used to address the question of potential increases in blood pressure and other safety issues.
Ephedrine has been studied in more than 50 double blind, placebo-controlled clinical trials, some of long duration.
A far from exhaustive literature search produced the attached list of peer-reviewed, published, clinical trials.
Most have compared ephedrine to placebo, and to other sympathomimetic drugs used to treat asthma.
However, others have involved smoking cessation, sexual function and athletic performance.
Nearly a dozen of these trials involved caffeine/ephedrine combinations using does exceeding those found in herbal supplements.
In total, more than 2000 individuals have been enrolled in these trials.
In several studies there was even continuous cardiac monitoring in middle-aged patients with known heart disease; no effect was observed.
No clinically significant episodes of toxicity were reported.
Including these and other studies on ephedrine that have been excluded from the RAND review will increase the power of the safety calculations that can be derived from clinical data.
One of the major limitations of the report was the composition of the TEP and the reviewers who made subjective assessments of the AERs.
Given the importance placed on assessment of AERs, it is unfortunate that no pathologist was included in the view or on the panel.
The lack of expertise is obvious from the comments made about the individual AERs.
The failure to provide information about any potential conflicts of reviewers also detracts from the study.
Why were the findings of Expert Panel of the Ephedra Education Counsel not considered? The analysis of this panel was in some ways unique, as it is the only consensus opinion on ephedra safety.
In addition, this panel conducted the most comprehensive review of the ephedra AERs to date, and yet the causality assessment, which conflicted the findings of the draft report, are not even mentioned.
If RAND believes that the EEC review and analysis was, in some way scientifically flawed, then the reasons for that belief should be stated.
Rand Response
A3-76
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment The danger of drawing conclusions from AERs without a control group can be illustrated by examining data from randomized trials in which participants are blinded to whether they are receiving the study treatment or inactive placebo.
In the placebo group of a recent randomized trial,2 there was an increase in ventricular couplets (extra heart beats) at the 4th week of the study 9from 3% at baseline to around 14% at week 4).
This is, of course, not due to the placebo, which is inactive, but rather just spontaneous ventricular couplets that occurred by chance.
However, if these participants had been given ephedrine alkaloids in an uncontrolled study (without placebo), this change could have been attributed, incorrectly, to the ephedra.
That is, these could be AERs that were attributed to ephedra.
In fact, in the controlled trial, a similar increase in ventricular couplets was not seen in the ephedra/caffeine arm.
Another example is the 15-year-old female (case 12843) with Bland-White-Garland syndrome who died while playing soccer.
This disorder has been associated with sudden death after physical exertion.
In the absence of a unique pathologic process, it is almost never possible to establish a causal association on the basis of adverse event reports.
There is nothing pathologically or diagnostically unique about the adverse events noted in the ephedra database (e.g., myocardial infarction, stroke) that allow one to distinguish a spontaneous event from one caused by use of Ephedra products.
In fact, a review of all autopsy data from ephedra AERs by Dr. Grover Hutchins, a Professor of Pathology at the John Hopkins University School of Medicine and member of the Expert Panel of the EEC, concluded that "The pathology data available do not show any pattern consistent with ephedrine alkaloid-containing dietary supplements as a cause of death."5 Similarly, 10 participants in the ephedra/caffeine group (12% of these participants) withdrew because of cardiovascular symptoms (palpitations, elevated blood pressure, arrhythmias).
If there were no control group, these also might have been attributed to the ephedra/caffeine combination.
However, the same proportion of participants in the placebo group (13%) withdrew for the same reasons.
The withdrawal rate in the ephedra/caffeine group thus was consistent with the background rate of these events in a placebo group unrelated to ephedra use.
A second limitation of adverse event reports is that other potential causes of the event are often present, making it extremely difficult to determine if an event truly is related to the exposure.
As an example, it is well established that physical exertion can trigger myocardial infarctions and cardiac arrest (up to a 74-fold increase in the risk of sudden death, according to a recent report in the New England Journal of Medicine6) Rand Response
A3-77
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment Therefore, a case such as the 38-year-old man with three vessel coronary disease and a dilated heart who died after jogging could very well have been related only to the physical exertion and not the ephedra.
According to his wife, his heart problems had been known for at least five years.
In addition, this man had been taking an ephedra product for one year without apparent ill effect.
The third limitation of AERs is that their interpretation remains subjective.
Even experts in the field will disagree about the possibility that an event may or may not be due to an exposure.
The RAND report (Table 22) displays a comparison of the causality assessment between their review panel and a published report by reviewers for the FDA.3 In only two out of 20 cases that both groups reviewed was their agreement about the highest level of possible causality.
For example, with respect to the 38year-old discussed above, the Haller and Benowitz review recorded this event as "Definitely or probably related" to ephedra while the RAND report classified it as only "Possibly causal."
Another review of AERs performed by Dr. Theodore Farber and Dr. Norbert Page, members of the Expert Panel of the EEC, reveals similar disagreements.
The two "probable" cases reviewed by EPC were rated as "Low Possible" (case 12980) and "Improbable" (case 13418) by Drs. Farber and Page.
The fact that the etiology of events can be debated simply illustrates the substantial limitation of case reports that lack a comparison control group.
This echoes reviews done by FDA and its consultants in which agreement about causality was poor.
For example, two consultants from FDA, Drs. Ricaurte and Stoll, reviewed 28 AERs related to neurological events.
Dr. Ricaurte classified eleven cases as "attributable" while Dr. Stoll classified only five as "attributable."5 Only two of the consultant's findings overlapped - that is, there were only two cases that both Dr. Ricaurte and Dr. Stoll agreed should be categorized as "attributable."5 This disagreement is not a flaw of the reviewers, but rather a flaw of AERs.
A fourth limitation of AERs is that ingestion of the substance in question cannot always be substantiated.
For example, case 10276 is a 32-year-old with an enlarged heart who was found dead in his truck.
Although a product that contains herbal ephedra was found in his truck, so were several bottles of cold medications, including Nyquil.
Toxicology revealed no ephedrine, but did identify pseudoephedrine and doxylamine, both components on Nyquil.
Thus, there is no evidence that this person even ingested the herbal ephedra.
A similar case (13096) revealed no ephedrine in a toxicology screen again suggesting that the man had not ingested ephedrine around the time of death.
Equally importantly this man died of a disease that appeared to run Rand Response
A3-78
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment in his family (aortic dissection), including an 18-year-old niece.
In summary, AERs cannot be used to assess causality.
As stated by several authors with experience in interpreting adverse event reports for the FDA: "It is probably impossible to do comparative analyses employing ADE [adverse drug event] reports for drugs that have received extensive publicity in the mass media for an adverse event..."7 In fact, the FDA's Center for Drug Evaluation and Research pointed out, in a February 10, 2000 memorandum concerning ephedra products, that "it is possible that the reported serious adverse events are reflective of coincidental background spontaneous occurrences in the population and are not necessarily causally related to [the use of dietary supplements containing ephedrine-type alkaloids]
The RAND review notes this as well, stating that "The most important limitation [of their assessment of adverse events] is that the study design, that is an assessment of case reports, is insufficient to warrant definite conclusions regarding causality."
They list this limitation as one of the "most important...gaps" in the current knowledge-base.
The RAND review also states that "Disentangling the relative importance of the pre-existing condition and the ephedra use is not possible."
They state further that "Continued analysis of case reports cannot substitute for a properly designed study to assess causality.
A case control study would probably be the study design of choice."
Their Technical Expert Panel also "judged that case reports alone would be insufficient to establish definite causality between ephedra use and serious adverse events."
Because of these limitations, terms such as "probably causal" and "possibly causal" in AER reviews are potentially misleading (see, in particular, the "Conclusions" section of the "Structured Abstract," page vi, and the "Conclusions" section, page 112).
They represent only reviewers' assessment of causality based on uncontrolled data and subjective assessments.
Although these terms are often used in scientific publications, their use in the RAND report may suggest a level of evidence that does not exist from the current data.
These statements, therefore, should not be taken out of context.
RAND's stated limitation that "Definite causality cannot be determined from case reports" must be kept in mind when interpreting this report.
It is also critically important to remember that case reports can produce false signals of cause and effect.8,9 Most importantly, because of the limitation of AERs, it is unclear why the RAND report states, in the Structured Abstract, that "These [sic] is sufficient evidence to suggest a possible causal role of ephedracontaining dietary supplements in rare but serious adverse Rand Response
A3-79
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment events, particularly cerebral hemorrhage."
With respect to a possible causal role of ephedra in adverse events, RAND acknowledges that AERs are not sufficient to draw conclusions about causality, consistent with the known limitations of AERs discussed above.
In addition, this comment is puzzling given that their "Conclusions" section (ages 112-113) does not state this at all.
With respect to cerebral hemorrhage, the only comment in the body of the report on cerebral hemorrhage refers to a case-control study of phenylpropanolamine (PPA) and cerebral hemorrhage.10 However, the RAND report refers to this study only as an example of case-control methodology that could be applied in the future to ephedra.
The report does not discuss the PPA study further.
In fact, this study has been heavily criticized.
Despite this, there was not a formal review of this study by RAND (and there were no members of the technical expert panel listed with expertise in epidemiology to perform such a review).
In addition, PPA and ephedra have different chemical structures and different pharmacological activities.
Finally, the RAND report does not mention that the PPA report also presented data on non-PPA, ephedrine-alkaloid containing products.
These agents included medications that contained pseudoephedrine hydrochloride, phenylephrine, ephedrine, and epinephrine.
In the report, there was similar prevalence of use of these products among those with and without hemorrhagic strokes.
Although this is not a definitive analysis, it suggests that there was no association between these ephedra-containing products and hemorrhagic stroke.
Therefore, the statement in the Conclusions section of the Structured Abstract of the RAND report is inconsistent with currently available scientific data.
In summary, the RAND review supports the use of herbal ephedra and caffeine for weight loss, an effect that may have beneficial health consequences.
The report also suggest, from controlled studies, that adverse events following ephedra use are, at most, rare.
(The should not imply that the events are even causally related to ephedra us.)
Most importantly, because of the reliance on AERs, the report cannot establish a causal effect of ephedra on serious adverse events.
Review of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports - Limitation of Review.
On pages 109-110, the report identifies potential limitations associated with the review of anecdotal adverse event reports.
These limitations are buried at the end of the report, rather than being incorporated into the appropriate sections of the report (as per prior AHRQ reports, such as the Garlic Report - see Section IX, herein).
Moreover, a number of limitations are not prominently identified, including but not limited to: a) The poor quality of the data and information contained in the anecdotal adverse event Rand Response
A3-80
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment reports; b) Inherent problems associated with voluntary reporting systems; c) The number of individuals in the general population who experience the adverse events identified (i.e. background risk); d) The possibility that certain products may not have been standardized and/or manufactured according to Good Manufacturing Practices ("GMPs") - resulting in potential adverse events that have nothing to do with ephedra or caffeine when consumed in recommended amounts.
Specifically, in the absence of standardization and quality control, it is conceivable that certain products may contain far more ephedra or caffeine (or other constituents) than indicated on the product label.
This possibility must be considered when evaluating anecdotal adverse event reports.
In the absence of identical product identity, any general conclusions regarding ephedra and caffeine are inappropriate and highly suspect based upon adverse event reports (see the AHRQ Garlic Report for an appropriate way to address this issue).
In my opinion, RAND should strongly support immediate issuance by the FDA of dietary supplement GMPs and should endorse stringent quality control measures to ensure that all ephedra supplements contain what they are claimed to contain; e) The possibility that the consumer abused or misused a product by ingesting more than the recommended amount - or that the consumer ignored detailed product warnings and contraindications.
RAND should emphasize the detailed warning label contained on the vast majority of ephedra supplements - and should acknowledge that there is little way to know from anecdotal data whether a consumer abused a product (either intentionally or more likely inadvertently); f) The possibility that the anecdotal adverse event reflects chance, coincidence , or confounding factors - including but not limited to the possibility that ingestion of a different product or substance led to the stated event.
I I. Review of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports - B. Ascribing Causality to Adverse Event Reports - 1.
Reliance on Unpublished Article.
In order to establish a framework for analyzing the adverse event reports, the draft report relies upon an unpublished article written by Cynthia Mulrow, M.D. Reliance upon an unpublished, non peerreviewed article to establish the framework for a critical portion of the report is entirely unacceptable.
AHRQ studies have not, to our knowledge, ever relied upon an unpulished article to establish the framework for this type of analysis.
In addition, reviewers such as myself have no way of analyzing the article - thereby defeating one of the primary reasons for review of the draft report.
II.
Review of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports - B. Ascribing Causality to Adverse Event Reports - 2.
Failure to Review Factors Critical to the Interpretation of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports Table 4 of the draft report Rand Response
A3-81
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment summarizes the various methods researchers use to assess causality from adverse event reports.
The following nine factors are identified: a.
Temporal relationship.
b. Dechallenge response.
c. Rechallenge response.
d.
Could there be an alternative explanation? For example, dehydration or consumption of other toxic substances.
e) Prior reaction to same substance.
f) Dose response.
g) Objective evidence of adverse event.
h) Previous conclusive reports.
i) Definition of substance.
Despite the report's reference to these nine factors, it is my understanding that the report concludes that events are "probably causal" based upon a review of only two factors - a and g.
The draft report does not explain why RAND believes only two factors out of nine can be used to ascribe degrees of causation to anecdotal adverse event reports.
II.
Review of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports - B. Ascribing Causality to Adverse Event Reports - 2.
Failure to Review Factors Critical to the Interpretation of Anecdotal Adverse Event Reports (cont'd).
The draft report also indicates that three factors are used to determine if an event is "probably causal": a) Reasonable certainty that the adverse event occurred.
b) Reasonable certainty that the patient took ephedra in a dose and timing compatible with the known pharmacology of ephedrine. c) An adequate evaluation must have been done to rule out other potential causes for the adverse event.
The third factor (factor c, above) is exceptionally problematic from a scientific perspective.
The report acknowledges that the third factor is subjective.
Specifically, in an effort to rule out other potential causes, the report indicates that such a determination was made by determining if the subject had a pre-existing condition that was identified in the adverse event report.
Adverse Event Reports.
While CRN acknowledges that the judgments made about the AERs were, overall, much more conservative than those made by other reviewers, there is concern that, in some cases, a much more likely explanation was evident, but still possible causality was assigned.
Some examples follow, although they are not allinclusive: 1.
Case 10276.
A deceased truck driver was found with cold tablets, Nyquil and Vick's Formula 44, in addition to ephedra-containing supplements.
The toxicology screen was negative for ephedrine, but positive for pseudoephedrine.
The much more obvious and likely culprit here would be one of the pseudoephedrine-containing cold formulas, since ephedrine is the dominant alkaloid by far in ephedra products, and the clearance rates for the alkaloids are roughly the same.
2.
Case 12843.
A 15 year old died of a congenital abnormality of the left coronary artery No ephedrine was Rand Response
A3-82
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment reported in her system.
How could this possibly be causal? 3.
Case 10874.
A woman with considerable substance abuse problems and some use of ephedra supplements for weight loss tested positive for phenylpropanolamine (PPA), but not for ephedrine or pseudoephedrine.
The former is but a minor constituent of ephedra and products derived there from, but were a common primary component of a number of OTC weight loss products until recently.
Such products are a much more likely source of the PPA than the "possibly causal" ephedra supplements.
We have several concerns about the way the information is presented in the sections related to safety.
It is AHPA's position that the report's safety assessment section reviews case reports from a passive event reporting system without fully and redundantly disclosing what has already been determined about the nature of the FDA's current AER system.
Appropriate disclosures include, at a minimum, a reference to the GAO report on the subject and recognition that the Special Working Group of the office of Special Nutritional (FDA: Food Products Containing Ephedrine Alkaloids, Washington D.C., October 11th-12th, 1995) explicitly stated that such a system cannot, by it's nature, show causality.
AHPA recognizes that limitations in the clinical trial data lead one necessarily to consider case reports for an assessment of serious adverse events.
The fact that there are no serious adverse events reported in any of the clinical study should however be stressed, even as it is identified as of insufficient statistical power to detect a rate of serious adverse events.
This fact should be repeated at the Structured Abstract and in the Conclusions, for example, and the total number of patients in these studies (is that 2319 in the intervention groups?) should be identified.
In addition, Table 17 should be expanded to include each of the serious adverse events that are subject to safety review in the draft (e.g. death, myocardial infarction, and stroke) and the number "zero" should be entered in both the placebo and intervention columns, if that was in fact the published observation.
The Draft contains an extensive review of the specific AER case reports.
This inherent emphasis presents an unbalanced appearance with respect to the intent of the original key questions.
In comparison, assessment of efficacy is presented in a much more summarized fashion.
In arriving at criteria for judging the causal relationship in case reports of adverse effects from ephedra, the concept of biological plausibility is conspicuously absent.
All else bring equal, adverse events that are biologically plausible (consistent with the mechanism of action of the drug in question) are more likely to be causally related to drug use We acknowledge that the case reports cannot show causality.
We do not need to discuss the findings of other with respect to the adequacy of the FDA AER system.
We assessed the information we did receive using explicit criteria, and our findings are reported.
Rand Response
We do not favor, as a general rule, adding rows or columns to a Table when all the entries in each cell will be the same.
Such information can more expeditiously be conveyed in the text.
We cannot change the amount of space needed to describe what we did.
A3-83
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment than those, which are not.
Sudden death, myocardial infarction, and stroke are biologically plausible toxic effects of ephedra.
This should be taken into account when interpreting the data.
Clearly there is no right or wrong answer with regard to how much data is needed to judge the causality of an adverse event case report as "probable" or "possible" but I believe that the criteria used in this review have resulted in conclusions that that are understated.
There is nothing wrong with the criteria per se, but using the term "probable" for a death that has fulfilled every review criteria (except rechallenge which is by definition impossible) understates the quality of the data and implications of the case.
Similarly, the term "possible" for cases that have satisfied several but not all criteria makes it sound like these importance of these cases should be minimized, which I do not think is the intent of the report.
For example, requiring negative angiographies to support causality for myocardial infarction has a rationale, but will necessarily exclude many or most cases because not all patients have this procedure.
The importance of this wording is illustrated by the comparison of the Benowitz ephedrine data and your group's reanalysis of it, which would have downgraded so many case reports as to make the report unpublishable.
Instead, It was published and shows a remarkable similarity in adverse event profile with the current report.
This congruence of findings is in fact some of the strongest literature support for the conclusions of the current report regarding toxicities from ephedrine and ephedra, and these two reports suggest just that.
The alternative to changing the terminology of the report is to provide additional commentary on the interpretation of the findings; that, in a view of 1) biological plausibility, 2) the considerable number of case reports emanating form a spontaneous reporting system, 3) similar toxic effects of pharmaceutical ephedrine, and 4) similar toxic effects of phenylpropanolamine, the findings of the current review are highly suggestive of a relationship between herbal ephedra and serious adverse events such as sudden death, myocardial infarction, and stroke.
Discussion at the NIH requested that the title "possibly causal" was misleading and should be retitled to indicate more accurately the Rand staff interpretation that there is no proof of causality and while causality is possible, it is not probable.
Study Selection.
Study selection was not appropriate.
Partly for the reasons stated above, but also because of the reliance placed upon passively collected anecdotal data.
The mere fact that existing clinical trials contained "too few Rand Response
A3-84
Appendix 3.
Reviewer Comments (continued) Reviewer Comment (subjects) to allow adequate statistical power to access the rate of serious adverse events," does not make AER analysis any more reliable or probative.
In fact, case reports cannot be "relied upon to assess serious adverse events," except, perhaps for the occurrence of rare disorders such as coronary artery dissection.
The decision to include an analysis of AERs is particularly puzzling, given that the TEP chose to reject the Haller and Benowitz analyzing the same AERs (see "rejected articles" #195, record #116)! Heart attack and stroke are common disorders in our society, and thousands of ephedra product users would be expected to experience vascular events, even if ephedra did not exist.
Analysis of AERs for common disorders, which are even more frequent among the overweight, is virtually guaranteed to show a connection with ephedra use, even if no such connection exists (for example, see the August 1 article, "Obesity and the Risk of Heart Failure" in the New England Journal of Medicine).
Appraisal of Studies.
Important parameters that could alter study results have not been systematically addressed.
The brief discussion of obesity is confined to generalities.
Obesity is a prothrombotic disease.
[1].
Overweight people, presumably the majority of ephedra supplements users, are at greater risk for sudden cardiac death (SCD), and heart disease [2].
The report fails to provide any sort of epidemiologic prospective, leaving the false impression that the occurrence of these disorders among ephedra product users is somehow surprising or unanticipated.
In fact, when the GAO wrote its highly critical analysis of the FDA's proposed rule on ephedra products, one of the issues raised was FDA failure to account for the reality that "there is almost always an underlying background rate for any clinical event in a population, regardless of whether there was exposure to a particular product..."
The RAND report states that 3 billion servings of ephedra were sold in 1999.
Assuming that 3 servings are used per day for 12 weeks (as Haller and Benowitz do in the NEJM paper), then there were 12 million users.
The accepted rate for sudden death, heart attack, and stroke in the U.S. is 0.1, .5, and .2 percent per year respectively [3]; which means that even if ephedra/ephedrine has absolutely no relationship to any of these disorders, 12,000 cases of SCD, 60,000 cases of myocardial infarction, and 24,000 cases of stroke would still be expected among ephedra users each year.
Not providing this information to general readers paints a completely misleading picture and leads to a misinformed, if not false, impression of relative risk.
It also repeats the same FDA error already criticized by the Government Accounting Office.
Data Collection No effort is made to reduce bias in the The reviewer is incorrect The
